It is impossible from any point of view, morphological, biological or serological, to draw a sharp dividing line in this series. The forms change gradually from the mycelial organism to the bacillary, acid-fast organism. It is biologically a group complex and should be so considered. No doubt experiments with a larger series of species would yield results giving a possibility of closer classification and the introduction of some of the forms now in a debatable position, as Bacillus diphtheriae and Bacillus mallei, and other organisms, sometimes called, on account of their morphological irregularities, corynebacterium and mycobacterium, would help to show their real relation to both the Streptothrices and the true bacteria. The latter in many ways are acknowledged to be far from primitive; their endospores, flagella, and food habits all indicate a relatively high degree of specialization. Hence it would seem biologically more reasonable to look upon this group of Streptothrices with their variable morphology and close relationships as representing the ancestral type that gave rise to both the higher fungi and true bacteria, and not as being themselves higher bacteria. The various bacteria, other than the acid-fast forms, can readily have arisen from the non-acid-fast bacillary types, or even as non-acid-fast specializations of the mixed types. All the various forms shown at present by the bacteria,-cocci, spirilla, bacilli, etc.,-either separate or in chains and masses, are to be recognized in this group, and specializations in one or another line in the past would readily have given rise to the types we consider true bacteria. The processes of evolution have carried them far away from the parent stock and made them into this group. The recognition of this group complex and of the intermediate forms indicates clearly the past history and present relations of these interesting organisms. These relations may be represented by the following scheme. See PDF for Structure It is probable that the relation between the acid-fast organisms and the Streptothrices is a closer one than that between the Streptothrices and the bacteria, perhaps close enough to warrant a common genus for both.
The experiments recorded in this paper confirm the observations of Friedberger that acutely toxic bodies can be produced from typhoid bacilli by the action of sensitizer and complement and that, when small quantities of bacteria are used, an excess of sensitization either interferes with the formation of the poisons or leads to a cleavage of the bacterial proteid beyond the poisonous intermediate products spoken of as anaphylatoxins. Unlike the experience of other workers with poisons of this nature, however, our experiments have shown that the action of complement upon typhoid bacilli strongly sensitized or not at all sensitized may be carried on, at body temperature, for considerably longer than twelve hours without leading to a destruction of the poisons, and that this is true when the quantities of the bacteria used vary within the wide range of from one to twelve agar slants. It has been found, in fact, that in the case of this microorganism prolonged exposure at the higher temperature of considerable quantities of bacteria constitutes an unfailing method of regularly obtaining powerful poisons. The results obtained by the use of smaller quantities and the less vigorous complement action at low temperatures are far less regular or satisfactory. It would appear from this that complement action of considerable vigor is required to obtain from this bacillus any appreciable yield of anaphylatoxin, and that the poison, once formed, is not as unstable as that found in other microorganisms by Neufeld and Dold and others. In fact, although we have never observed complete lysis in vitro of the typhoid bacilli treated with antibody and complement, the sensitized bacteria exposed to the action of complement for as long as fifteen hours at 37.5 degrees C. showed, in our experiments, much disintegration, and yet powerful poisons were present. Were the influence of lysis or of the too vigorous action of the serum bodies as rapidly poison-destroying in the case of this bacillus as it has been shown to be in the case of some other bacteria, it would be hard to understand how anaphylatoxins could play any part in the toxemia of typhoid fever. This phase of our experiments, however, seems to indicate that the conditions prevailing in the infected body at the height of this disease would furnish ideal criteria for anaphylatoxin production, since, in such cases, vigorously sensitized bacilli, in large numbers, are under the prolonged influence of considerable quantities of complement, conditions exactly comparable to those prevailing in our experiments. Granted that this state of affairs is actually the case, then the subsidence of the disease might depend merely upon limitation of the supply of antigen, as the increasing bactericidal action of the blood constituents come into play, and upon the consequent diminution of the anaphylatoxin. For as the bacteria diminish and the sensitizer increases, a changed proportion between them is established which, finally, as experiment has shown, results in a failure of anaphylatoxin production. For although our experiments have shown that, within a wide latitude of relative proportions of bacteria and antibody, anaphylatoxin can be formed, beyond this range an excess of one or the other element eventually will prevent their formation. It is not, however, the purpose of this paper to discuss the mechanism of the subsidence of the disease since this phase of the work will necessitate further experimental study. In regard to the experiments with kaolin, we were unable to confirm the contention of Keysser and Wassermann, though it is more than likely that toxic bodies could be formed by the action of complement upon any foreign proteid rendered amenable to its action. We are not inclined to attribute too much importance to these negative results, recording them merely as they occurred. However, should it be found subsequently that anaphylatoxins can be formed in this way, it seems unlikely that they are formed from the sensitizer or amboceptor as matrix, since this was not specifically adsorbed out of concentrated serum by the kaolin in our experiments. On the basis of experiments with so called endotoxins, ,we feel that the existence of such preformed intracellular poisons as an element in typhoid toxemia has not been proved, and is not absolutely necessary for the explanation of the phenomena occurring in this disease. However, the diarrhea, the hemorrhagic lesions, and the protracted symptoms following the injection of extracts and filtrates of the bacillus, differing so strikingly from the acute illness with rapid death or equally rapid recovery resulting from anaphylatoxin poisoning, would justify the assumption that poisons of this nature may still play a part in the disease, adding an additional specific characteristic to the clinical picture. As stated before, however, it is not improbable that all these characteristics may represent merely a more protracted or subacute state of anaphylatoxin toxemia. The experiments with autolysates, although none of them were fatal in their results upon guinea pigs, have sufficiently indicated that poisons comparable to anaphylatoxins can be formed in this way. This would indicate that a reaction of proteolysis, which may take place slowly by autolysis, is hastened by the action of complement, and its velocity is still further augmented by the increase, within certain limits, of the sensitization,-a conception which would attribute to the combined action of complement and sensitizer a function not incomparable to that of the bodies spoken of as catalytic agents.
Weichardt claims to have demonstrated the presence of an organic body in the expired air. He allowed the exhaled breath to pass through hydrochloric acid solution, evaporated the resulting solution to dryness on a water bath, and obtained a weighable residue which charred on ignition. If he neutralized the acid solution and concentrated it under reduced pressure, he obtained a solution which inhibited the bluing of the guaiacum indicator by blood. By exposing calcium chloride in a room in which the air had been vitiated, he claimed also to have obtained a substance from the air which prevented the bluing of the guaiacum indicator by blood. The experiments here recorded show that a variable amount of matter is retained by weak hydrochloric solution when exhaled breath is passed through it, and that this matter is volatile on ignition. Contrary to the findings of Weichardt, there is no charring or blackening. Nesslerization shows the residue to consist mainly, if not wholly, of ammonium chloride. This ammonia is believed to have come from the decomposition of food particles about the teeth. In one case the person (S.) had smoked just before the experiment, so that a small amount of the ammonia from the tobacco smoke may have been held temporarily by the saliva and food particles in the mouth and been given off gradually during the experiment. Weichardt's experiments on the inhibition of the guaiacum test for blood by means of the substances retained when exhaled breath is passed through hydrochloric acid or over calcium chloride crystals are not corroborated. It is further shown that the guaiacum indicator is unreliable for these tests in view of the fact that a small amount of free acid or free alkali will inhibit the guaiacum test for blood. This fact is offered as a probable explanation of Weichardt's results. Calcium chloride alone gives a deep blue color with the guaiacin indicator. Weichardt used this salt to collect from the expired breath certain unknown substances which he claims inhibit the oxidation of guaiacum by blood. His results are therefore inconclusive. The phenolphthalin test for blood has been studied in this connection and further light has been thrown on this reaction. The sodium salt of phenolphthalin is colorless in alkaline solution, and is readily oxidized by minute quantities of blood to phenolphthalein which gives a characteristic deep purplish red color in alkaline solution. It has been found that the presence of calcium chloride and ammonium chloride in small amounts retards and, in large amounts, prevents this reaction. It is believed that any salt composed of a weak base combined with a strong acid will have the same effect. This is discussed in the text. It has also been shown that the presence of calcium chloride or ammonium chloride decreases the depth of color of phenolphthalein in sodium hydroxide solution. Carbon dioxide also prevents the oxidation of phenolphthalin by blood. Of course this does not mean that carbon dioxide prevents the action of the oxidizing ferments generally. In this particular case the substance to be oxidized, namely phenolphthalin, was not allowed by reason of the presence of the carbon dioxide to combine with the alkali and thereby assume a state in which it could be easily oxidized. The results of one experiment seem to indicate a relation between the amount of dissolved oxygen in the solutions and the percentage of oxidation. Sodium chloride either alone or with the aid of hydrogen peroxide is able to bring about the oxidation of phenolphthalin in alkali to a very slight extent (3.5 to 5 per cent. in twenty-four hours). Therefore phenolphthalin as a test for oxidizing ferments should not be used in the presence of an appreciable amount of inorganic salts or carbon dioxide. Complete dialysis is recommended in these cases. It is also to be noted that the great delicacy of the test allows considerable dilution. Liquids were obtained from the expired breath by passing this through weak hydrochloric acid or by condensing the moisture in it by conducting it through cooled Drechsel bottles. Attempts were then made to prove the presence in these liquids of some substance which inhibits the oxidation of phenolphthalin by blood, but all were unsuccessful. Moreover attempts to concentrate these liquids by evaporation under reduced pressure or by the passage of a direct current (colloidal travel) were also unsuccessful. It is planned to improve upon the apparatus used to concentrate colloids by the passage of a direct current, and to test the effect of expired breath products on the rate of oxidation of phenolphthalin by blood.
Apparently, then, we are confronted with this result,-that citrate plasma which causes little or no constriction of the stretched artery ring, little or no slowing of the flow through the frog perfusion preparation, while the corresponding serum produces a marked effect on both preparations, will affect the intestine or uterus preparation practically in the same way as the corresponding serum. Hirudin plasma and serum exert on the intestine and uterus preparations practically the same effect, causing a marked increase of tone. On the artery ring preparation, there is a difference although it is not so strongly marked as in the case of the citrate material. The frog perfusion preparation, as regards the effect of the hirudin material, seems to occupy an intermediate position between the intestine and uterus on the one hand, and the artery ring on the other. Of the three plasmas, the peptone plasma most closely resembles serum in its action on the artery rings. Like the other plasmas its effect on the intestine and uterus does not differ appreciably from that of the serum. From these observations the following conclusions seem justified. A change occurs in shed blood which confers on it the property of constricting artery rings and of slowing the flow through the perfused frog preparation. If this property is in any degree possessed by circulating blood it is at least markedly increased after the blood is shed. The change, whatever it may be, does not entail any essential alteration in the action of the blood on intestine and uterus segments. The tone-increasing property developed in the shed blood may, therefore, so far as the four test objects included in the present survey are concerned, be looked upon as especially affecting the blood vessels and probably their smooth muscle directly. This need not imply that the pressor substance, if it is a single definite substance developed in the shed blood, exerts no action on the smooth muscle of the intestine and uterus preparations, but merely that its action on these objects is masked by the general action of the serum and plasma, so that in the presence of the other constituents common to serum and plasma, its effect is inconspicuous or not to be detected at all, while on the blood vessel preparations, especially the artery rings, the effect of the pressor substance is the dominant one, and the general action of the serum and plasma is feeble or undetectable. It is not the clotting process as such, i.e., the actual change of fibrinogen into fibrin, that is responsible for the differences between serum and plasma revealed by the biological tests employed but some process which precedes or accompanies the clotting and which may or may not be causally related to it. Changes in formed elements of the blood under the influence of the changed conditions (contact with foreign bodies, restriction of gaseous exchange, etc.). which blood encounters as soon as it leaves the living vessels, are known to occur. Among these it is to be assumed are the changes which condition the differences between plasma and serum under discussion.(16) Even if these changes represent preliminary stages in coagulation (liberation of the factors necessary to the formation of thrombin, for instance), they may still occur to a greater or less extent in blood which is prevented in certain ways from clotting since it is known that the procedures by which the various non-coagulable plasmas are obtained break at different points the chain of events which normally ends in coagulation. A procedure which simply supplies sufficient antithrombin to neutralize the thrombin which has been allowed to form in normal amount may not interfere at all with the changes in the formed elements, and the pressor property of the resulting plasma may then be as marked as that of the serum. On the other hand, a procedure which binders clotting by preventing or diminishing the alterations in the cells, for example, the addition of a substance which acts as a preservative for blood platelets, will very likely yield a plasma with little or no pressor effect in comparison with the serum. The mere prevention of clotting, then, except in so far as it is an index of the prevention of changes in the formed elements may have little significance in preventing the development of the pressor property. Indeed it is conceivable that the alterations in the cells which are connected with the development of this property may even be wholly or partially independent of the cell changes concerned in coagulation. In this case it might be possible to obtain blood which would clot without developing the pressor property. The main results which seem to follow from our observations may be thus summarized: 1. The substance, or property, developed in shed blood by which it causes constriction of artery rings, is not developed, or at least not mainly developed, in connection with the actual change of fibrinogen to fibrin, since the constrictor action of different plasmas differs greatly, while the absence of coagulation is common to all. 2. The development of the constrictor substance, or property, is associated with changes undergone probably by formed elements of the blood when it is shed. These changes may be identical with the alterations, or with some of the alterations, preliminary to clotting. It is possible, however, that there may be changes connected with the development of the pressor property which, although concomitant with the liberation of the substances concerned in the production of thrombin, are yet quite independent of the clotting process. Our observations do not enable us to decide definitely between these possibilities. 3. The constrictor substance, or property, developed in shed blood acts especially on blood vessels and does not equally affect the other organs examined. This follows from the fact that a plasma and serum which differ markedly in their action on the blood vessels may have practically the same action on the intestine or uterus segments, an action which must therefore reside mainly, at least, in the original plasma itself. 4. The indication that the serum acts especially on blood vessels increases the interest of the suggestion that this action may play an important part in the prompt sealing of wounded vessels in addition to the mechanical effect of the clot, or by coming into operation before the clot has fully formed.
1. The brains of chick embryos, of cats six weeks old, of rabbits two months old, and of dogs three weeks old, when cultivated in vitro, develop long filaments which, according to their growth and their anatomical and tinctorial characters, must be considered as true axis cylinders. 2. Similar structures develop from spinal ganglia of rabbits seven months old, and from the spinal cord of cats six weeks old, and of rabbits two months old. 3. When severed from their origin by section these threads undergo degenerative changes which do not appear after nine hours, but which are seen after twenty hours, and continue until in the course of the following two days the thread degenerates completely. 4. After twenty hours the development of new axis cylinders from the central part of the cut fibers is observed.
Variations are described which have from time to time occurred in the structure and behavior of a transplantable, spindle-celled sarcoma of the fowl, a growth caused, as elsewhere shown, by a filterable agent. Of late the growth has frequently given rise to fatal hemorrhages from its substance. In some of the recent, rapidly growing tumors the cells have tended to be spherical, showing only a very tardy and imperfect differentiation to the spindle form. A giant-celled form of the growth is sometimes met with. Despite their diversity the tumors grade into one another and in the final analysis are all to be considered as spindle-celled sarcomata. Attempts to obtain an action of the etiological agent upon cells other than those it usually affects have failed, as have attempts to bring about changes in the histology of the sarcomata by attenuating the agent. Some of the lesser morphological variations in the sarcoma are undoubtedly due to local conditions in the host, and of the more important changes some have been associated with an increase in the growth's malignancy. For others the determining conditions have yet to be discovered. On the whole the variations described are not more marked than those occasionally manifested by the transplantable mammalian tumors, and traceable to the changes in a single strain of tumor cells during their propagation in successive hosts. In mammals the ultimate reason for these changes is not known. In the case of the chicken tumor some of them are undoubtedly the expression of changes in the growth's causative agent.
In rabbits with a severe pneumococcus bacteremia, the oxygen-combining power of the blood falls progressively up to the time of death. Coincident with this there is an even more marked fall in the oxygen content of the arterial blood. The changes in the blood in infected animals are analogous to those seen when the pneumococcus is grown on blood in vitro. They are due to the conversion of hemoglobin into methemoglobin.
1. Doses of less than six milligrams of hematin and, under certain conditions, larger doses may cause a slight rise of blood pressure. 2. Large doses of hematin cause a profound and prolonged fall of blood pressure. The principal factor in this fall of blood pressure is the marked dilatation of the splanchnic vessels. The splanchnic dilatation either does not occur at all or but very slightly if the splanchnic nerves are cut. The splanchnic dilatation is partly compensated for by a marked constriction of cutaneous vessels and it seems probable that the cutaneous constriction is active and not simply passive to the splanchnic engorgement. 3. Hematin acts upon the cardio-inhibitory center causing a marked slowing of the rate of heart-beat, and in large doses produces a typical vagal pulse or even marked irregularities in the amplitude and rhythm of the pulse. Under hematin the heart at first shows great loss of tone but later the tone increases beyond the normal. The cardiac output for a time is greatly diminished. 4. In the large doses employed by us, hematin depresses the respiratory center and death under hematin is due to paralysis of this center.
1. There is no demonstrable amount of agglutinin for Treponema pallidum (Noguchi) in normal human and normal rabbit serum in dilutions as low as 1:20. 2. Agglutinins for Treponema pallidum are readily produced in young rabbits by the administration of pure cultures of living spirochetes. 3. There is no appreciable amount of agglutinin for Treponema pallidum culture used in the sera of secondary and tertiary syphilis or in the cerebrospinal fluid of tertiary syphilis in dilutions of 1:20 to 1:640.
1. Rabbits may have spontaneous nephropathy and show no casts or albumen in the urine. 2. If we leave out of consideration rabbits 17, 18, 19, and 20, which were perfused with Adler's solution, and rabbits 8, 9, 17, 18, and 28, which were injected subcutaneously with potassium chromate, rabbits 49 and 73 show that spontaneous nephropathy offers some impediment to the perfusing serum.
1. The importance of the leucocyte in the resistance of animals to experimental pneumonia is emphasized by the fact that animals treated with benzol, a leucotoxic substance, rapidly succumb to the disease, while animals treated in like manner with toluol, a very similar chemical substance causing no leucopenia, show no decreased resistance. 2. The rôle of the leucocyte in the resistance of animals to experimental pneumonia is further emphasized by the fact that animals that respond to the pneumococcus infection with a leucocytosis, as occurs after the repeated injection of toluol, are more resistant to the pneumonia. Further, the hyperleucocytosis produced by repeated injection of nutrose before the production of pneumonia likewise seems to increase the resistance of the animals. 3. Experimental pneumonia is not necessarily fatal in rabbits. The factors determining the outcome of the disease are numerous; among these is the number of bacteria inoculated. Animals receiving small doses usually survive, while those receiving comparatively large numbers usually succumb.
1. Rabbits recovering from one attack of experimental pneumonia possess an active immunity. Such animals may subsequently withstand repeated increasing doses of pneumococci intratracheally. 2. Death may supervene after any one of subsequent injections, but it seems to depend partly upon the chronic changes in the cardiorespiratory apparatus. It may at least be said that it is usually unassociated with a septicemia which is an invariable accompaniment of fatal primary lobar pneumonia. 3. The serum from animals actively immunized by the repeated intratracheal inoculations with pneumococci may be used successfully to confer a passive immunity against the homologous organism.
In most cases of uncomplicated lobar pneumonia the decrease of respiratory surface is completely compensated for, and the oxygen content of the blood is within normal limits. Occasional cases of uncomplicated pneumonia have an oxygen content of the venous blood which is below normal. In the two cases reported here, this was associated with a carbon dioxide content of the blood which was higher than normally, and the condition was apparently due to an interference with the respiratory exchange of gases. In the terminal stage of the fatal cases of pneumonia in which death does not occur with great suddenness, there is often a progressive diminution in the oxygen content of the blood. Synchronous with this is a progressive decrease in the oxygen-combining capacity of the blood. These changes are usually seen in patients in whom an intense bacteremia has developed and are analogous to those found in the arterial blood of infected rabbits, and to those resulting from the growth of the pneumococcus in blood in vitro. In all three conditions there is probably a change of oxyhemoglobin to methemoglobin. This change of the hemoglobin molecule, so that it no longer takes up and gives off oxygen readily, is probably a factor in the immediate cause of death in many cases of pneumonia.
1. The addition of cholesterin to an alcoholic extract of heart or fetal liver increases the antigenic value of the extracts in the Wassermann reaction. 2. The optimum amount of cholesterin to be added to heart extract or fetal liver extract was found to be 0.4 per cent. 3. Cholesterin-heart extracts are superior to cholesterin-liver extracts and to alcoholic extracts of syphilitic livers, as well as to ether extracts of dried hearts. 4. Cholesterin-heart extracts prepared from different human hearts are practically equal in anticomplementary and antigenic value. Similar extracts prepared from guinea pig hearts have the same antigenic value as those prepared from human hearts. Both the human heart and the guinea pig heart extracts are superior to beef heart extract when the same amount of cholesterin is added to each of the extracts. 5. In testing blood serum for diagnostic purposes, it is not safe to use more than one fourth of the anticomplementary dose of the 0.4 per cent. cholesterin heart extract. In the work here presented, this consisted of a 1 in 10 emulsion. 6. In testing cerebrospinal fluids, 1 in 10 emulsions give slightly better reactions with smaller quantities of the fluid than do 1 in 6 emulsions. 7. Because of the simple preparation, the superior antigenic property, and the constant antigen value of cholesterin-heart extracts prepared from human hearts, we agree with McIntosh and Fildes that this form of extract fulfills the requirements of a standard antigen.
1. Intravenous injections of alkaline hematin in the rabbit produce an anemia the severity of which is proportional to the amount of hematin injected and the susceptibility of the animal. 2. Hemoglobinemia is an occasional consequence of hematin poisoning. 3. The leucocytes in hematin intoxication are usually increased in number and are always characterized by a high percentage of large mononuclear cells and by pigmented phagocytes. 4. The platelets are markedly reduced by alkaline hematin and ultimately a prolongation of the coagulation time of the blood and of the bleeding time results. 5. The anemia, the hemoglobinemia, the high percentage of large mononuclear leucocytes, the destruction of platelets, and the tendency to hemorrhage in malaria are all influenced by the malarial pigment, hematin.
1. In the cases of anemia studied (pernicious anemia, chlorosis, and secondary anemia) the blood flow in the hand is smaller than the normal flow. 2. Accepting Plesch's result, that the minute volume of the heart is increased in the anemias, the diminution in the hand flow is interpreted as a sign of a vasoconstriction in peripheral parts, which facilitates the increased flow through the lungs. 3. The deficiency in the hand flow is less in the chlorotic group than in the other cases of anemia. The explanation suggested is that the increased total volume of the blood in chlorosis permits the normal amount of hemoglobin to circulate through the lungs without a marked increase in the peripheral vasoconstriction. 4. The view that the diminution in the cutaneous blood flow in anemia is a necessary compensatory arrangement for increasing the flow through the lungs affords a natural explanation of the beneficial effect in many cutaneous disorders of general measures, especially those aimed at improving the quality of the blood. 5. In a case of bradycardia with a pulse rate permanently below 40 during rest in a sitting position, the hand flow was normal.
The acute exudative glomerular lesion of the rabbit's kidney caused by crotalus venom does not lead to a subacute or chronic glomerulonephritis. The hemorrhagic lesion of the glomerular tuft may show a process of repair characterized by the ingrowth, into the hemorrhagic masses, of endothelial cells from the uninjured part of the tuft. This process is, however, more analogous to the organization of a red thrombus than it is to any form of glomerular lesion known in man, and can hardly serve as an experimental demonstration of the mode of development of a subacute or chronic glomerular nephritis. On the other hand, crotalus venom causes a persistent albuminuria and extensive tubular degeneration and cast formation, with death, preceded by great emaciation, after five to six weeks.
Connective tissue cells of chick embryos and cells of a chicken sarcoma, proliferating in vitro, soon render acid the plasma about them, but they nevertheless continue to grow well. Evidently the tissue cell will withstand a considerably greater change in the reaction of the fluids about it than has usually been supposed. Under conditions of in vitro life in plasma, which do not provide for an artificial circulation, the acid produced by growing tissues diffuses only slowly and is subject to little dilution from this source. About tissues which grow very rapidly in vitro, as, for example, tumor tissues, there must be a marked concentration of metabolic products, and this may largely account for the poor results of attempts at the continuous propagation of such tissues in vitro.
Subcutaneous injections of adrenalin are, in contrast with its behavior in the production of the other effects of that drug, more favorable to the production of glycosuria in rabbits than intramuscular injections; the failures are fewer and the quantities of dextrose in the urine are generally larger. In general, as regards the stimulation of diuresis by adrenalin, a subcutaneous injection exerts generally a greater effect than an intramuscular one. Subcutaneous injections of a certain dose of adrenalin distributed over several areas are far less effective than the administration of that dose in a single injection; they fail frequently to produce any glycosuria, the quantity of dextrose in the urine, when present, being less, and the quantity of urine being generally diminished. Apparently the more slowly the injected adrenalin reaches the blood, the greater is its effect in producing glycosuria and generally, also, the greater its diuretic action.
Examination of the anaphylactic lung by means of Van Slyke's amino nitrogen method gave no evidence of an increased amount of proteid cleavage products of any kind in this organ. This investigation gives no support to the hypothesis that the true anaphylactic lung of the guinea pig is caused by proteid split products.
Changes in cardiac rhythm are not the only determinants of blood pressure variations in man. They play a part in the variations of systolic and diastolic pressures, the relative importance of which depends on the degree of arhythmia present and on the depth of respiration which, in itself, causes the systolic and diastolic pressures to decrease during inspiration and increase during expiration. No degree of rate variation can be regarded as a type. The cases range from those in which respiration governs the change of pressures entirely through those where more or less complicated mixtures of heart rate and respiratory influences intermingle to those in which extreme cardiac variations alone determine the pressure changes. The emphatic insistence of Henderson and his collaborators that heart rate changes play a more important part than is commonly recognized in man is true in many cases. That, in certain cases, it is the only determining influence may also be admitted, but they are in the minority. The majority show the intervention of a respiratory influence which controls, at least, the variations of systolic pressure. In the light of these results, the doctrine that, in man, an effective venous pressure exists sufficient during all respiratory phases to insure superimposable beats, must be subjected to further reinvestigation.
Internal hydrocephalus can be produced experimentally by injecting a foreign substance into the ventricles. In these experiments, aleuronat, a granular, insoluble material, has caused an acute inflammatory reaction, characterized in the first week by an exudate consisting largely of polynuclear leucocytes. Later the picture is one of a chronic process; polynuclear cells are replaced by lymphoid and large mononuclear cells and there is proliferation of the connective tissue in the choroid plexus. Proliferation of the ependyma occurs in the first week but becomes more advanced in the second and third weeks, and there is increase in neuroglia more marked in the long continued experiments. Ordinarily when aleuronat is injected into a serous cavity, the pleural cavity, for example, abundant accumulation of fluid takes place in twenty-four to forty-eight hours, and at the same time polynuclear leucocytes collect. In the experiments in which the irritant was injected into the ventricle of the brain there was little or no dilatation apparent in the first week; absence of dilatation in all probability is due to the free outflow of the fluid. When obstruction occurs during the chronic stage of the inflammatory process dilatation of the ventricle follows. Choked disc and other symptoms of increased intracranial pressure accompany experimental hydrocephalus. Dilatation occurs slowly and reaches a maximum in about two months. In some of the experiments of longer duration obstruction can be demonstrated in gross or microscopically. Obvious obstruction has not been found by gross examination in all instances, but in the experiments in which India ink was injected into the ventricle before death obstruction to outflow was very readily demonstrated. The third and fourth ventricles were in all instances filled with the pigment, but none appeared on the surface of the brain, whereas in normal dogs the entire surface, especially the base, became deeply pigmented. Obstruction to the circulation of cerebrospinal fluid causing internal hydrocephalus may occur at the foramen of Monro, in the aqueduct of Sylvius, or, doubtless with greatest frequency, at the foramen of Magendie.
Gentian violet and allied anilin dyes have a similar influence on bacterial growth, dividing bacteria into two groups corresponding in general to their reaction to the Gram stain. Among Gram-negative bacteria a strain is occasionally encountered which will not grow on violet agar, differentiating it from other members of the same species or variety. The reaction is quantitative, although the quantitative character is more marked with some species than with others. The streptococcus-pneumococcus group differ from other Gram-positive bacteria in their ability to grow in the presence of amounts of dye sufficient to inhibit the other species. The dysentery bacillus group shows marked variation in the presence of dyes. In the case of fuchsin the variation approaches closely a specific difference between the dysentery and paradysentery groups. The variations of the latter groups with other dyes show no correlation with the common differential characteristics. A closer study might reveal variations in other characteristics which would parallel the different reactions to dyes. Decolorization with sodium sulphite robs the dyes of some of their inhibitive powers.
Eight strains of pneumococci of serological type 1, eight strains of type 2, and eleven strains belonging to neither type have been tested by the method of acid agglutination. Strains belonging to the two typical groups have, as a rule, narrow zones of agglutination. The optimum hydrogen ion concentrations are different in the two cases. Other pneumococci have broad zones or, in a few cases, narrow zones not coincident with those occupied by the typical organisms. The agglutination of most of the pneumococci of types 1 and 2 is extremely susceptible to the inhibiting action of salts. This is not true of the other pneumococci. Old broth cultures may show an optimum hydrogen ion concentration different from that shown by young broth cultures.
1. The organisms described by Schottmüller under the name Streptococcus mucosus represent a well defined group with characteristics which indicate a closer relationship to the pneumococci than to the streptococci. 2. The members of this group are specifically agglutinable when treated according to the method of Porges. They do not agglutinate when subjected to the usual agglutination methods. 3. Complement fixation experiments with these organisms, compared with similar experiments with two varieties of pneumococci and two streptococci, indicate that they are closely related to the pneumococci. 4. No protection of mice against Pneumococcus mucosus by means of specific immune sera could be demonstrated. 5. The name Pneumococcus mucosus should be adopted for this group instead of Streptococcus mucosus.
A causative agent has been separated from three chicken tumors of very different sort, namely a spindle-celled sarcoma, an osteochondrosarcoma, and a spindle-celled sarcoma peculiarly fissured by blood sinuses. This was accomplished after the tumors had been transplanted repeatedly and their malignancy enhanced. Each of the tumor-producing agents is a distinct entity in that it gives rise only to growths of the precise kind from which it has been derived. All pass through Berkefeld cylinders impermeable at the same test to small bacteria, and two of the three retain their activity in tumor tissue that has been dried or glycerinated. All are strikingly dependent for their action on derangement of the tissue with which they are brought in contact. The general findings strongly suggest that the agents are of about the same size, and of the same natural class. It is perhaps not too much to say that their recognition points to the existence of a new group of entities which cause in chickens neoplasms of diverse character.
1. Goitre in fish is a non-infectious, non-contagious, symptomatic manifestation of a fault of nutrition, the exact biochemical nature of which has not been determined. 2. Feeding the highly artificial and incomplete diet of liver is the major etiological factor in bringing about this fault of nutrition which is at once corrected by feeding whole sea fish. 3. Water plays no essential part in the etiology, transmission, or distribution of the disease in the fish of this hatchery.
Accessory parathyroid tissue unassociated with the thyroid lobes is present in 5 to 6 per cent. of dogs. For the determination of the presence of accessory parathyroid tissue there are two tests: (1) the anatomical, often entailing serial sections of the neck and upper thoracic structures, and (2) the biological, consisting of the daily use of some calcium salt for two to three weeks. The latter is more easily carried out and more accurate. In the absence of all parathyroid tissue calcium salts will not save the animal's life, while in the presence of active parathyroid tissue calcium will save it. Many factors other than the amount of parathyroid tissue removed influence the onset of tetany, among which are age, pregnancy, lactation, rachitis, the administration of sulphur, and diet. Pregnancy and lactation tetany in dogs resembles in all essentials parathyroid tetany. Our observations are in harmony with those who hold that the thyroid and parathyroid are independent structures as regards their anatomy, physiology, and pathology. The removal of the parathyroids immediately lowers alimentary sugar tolerance, but rarely to the degree of constant glycosuria. In sharp contrast with thyroid substance in myxedema, the feeding of parathyroid substance fresh or dried by mouth is of no value in the parathyroid tetanies of dogs. Calcium salts have a striking palliative effect on parathyroid tetany and preventative action in tiding over otherwise fatal cases, but are in no sense curative. The mode of action is unknown. There is some evidence that calcium salts directly influence the parathyroid gland.
1. Growth of adult mammalian tissue can be prolonged by transference to fresh medium. 2. In a few cases this growth can be continued for ten or eleven generations up to a period of forty days. 3. In the majority of cases growth ceases after three or four generations. 4. After the first transference growth is increased, but in subsequent generations it gradually diminishes and ultimately ceases altogether.
A study of the histogenesis of elastic tissue in the embryonic ductus arteriosus of Sus scrofa is in accord with the theory that elastic fibrils are directly differentiated in the outlying portion of the protoplasm of the early connective tissue cell. In the occlusion of the postfetal ductus arteriosus of Sus scrofa there is early a hypertrophy of the internal elastic membrane. Subsequently there takes place a marked delamination of the thickened internal elastic membrane in the production of new and independent elastic fibers and lamellae. The formation of new elastic fibers from preformed elastic tissue is most abundant where the postfetal contraction of the ductus arteriosus is least marked. These new elastic fibers play an important part in the occlusion of the lumen of the postfetal ductus. Aside from the extensive formation of elastic fibers from preformed elastic tissue, in the occlusion of the lumen of the postfetal ductus arteriosus of Sus scrofa, there are also some elastic fibrils formed from non-elastic elements, apparently from connective tissue cells. In some recent preliminary work on ligations of the common carotid artery there was found, after an interval of from eight to twelve days, at some points between the ligatures, a slight but obvious cellular thickening of the so-called subendothelial stratum. Some of these connective tissue cells may have wandered from the other coats of the vessel, through the inner elastic membrane into the subendothelial stratum; others may have proliferated from cells in situ. Specific stains revealed near the periphery of some of these cells, i. e., in the outlying portion of the exoplasm, very delicate elastic fibrils, apparently the product of protoplasmic activity.
Dogs may be immunized against lethal doses of the duodenal loop poison by means of small doses of the loop fluid from dog or cat and by material obtained from human cases of intestinal obstruction. The immunity is transient and may disappear within a few weeks. Dogs immunized by repeated doses of loop fluid show a definite resistance against the intoxication of a closed duodenal loop and may survive twice the usual period. A dog that recovers from simple intestinal obstruction may possess a strong resistance to the intoxication of a closed duodenal loop, thus indicating a similar type of intoxication in the two conditions. The sera of immune dogs are inactive when incubated with duodenal loop fluid. The organ extracts and emulsions (liver, spleen, lung) of immune dogs rapidly destroy the loop poison during incubation in vitro. This destructive property is possessed by a clear filtrate of the digested immune organs, excluding adsorption, and is lost after long periods of incubation (twelve weeks). We are investigating the action of this immune organ extract to determine whether it can destroy the closed-loop poison in vivo and perhaps be of value in treatment.
Intoxication is evident in a drained duodenal loop whether it opens externally or into the jejunum and may be associated with more or less immunity which can be demonstrated after a period of days. Intoxication with a closed duodenal loop is identical whether the loop is left empty at operation or filled with a lethal dose of loop fluid. This again emphasizes the fact that absorption of the poison is essentially from the mucous membrane rather than from the contents of the closed loop. The intoxication of a closed duodenal loop is not modified by the presence of bile, pancreatic juice, or gastric secretion. Cessation of the normal flow of intestinal fluids which bathe the mucous membrane may be essentially responsible for the perverted activity of the mucosa and secretion of a poisonous material into the blood. Animals may be slightly more resistant to closed or drained loops during the warm months, which may be explained by the increased loss of body heat in the colder months. This indicates that cases of acute intestinal intoxication with subnormal temperature may be benefited by a generous supply of artificial heat.
Rat tumors and other tissues of foreign species grow actively in the chick embryo until the onset of a refractory period. Grafts of rat sarcoma established and growing actively at the onset of this period show a rapid cessation of growth between the 18th and 19th days of incubation. This is followed by a widespread degeneration of the rat cells and a marked activity of the connective tissue elements in the embryonal tissue round about. An occasional specimen may show small mononuclear infiltration or rarely accumulations of polymorphonuclear cells in the neighborhood of the strange tissue. During the 20th and 21st days the connective tissue capsule increases rapidly, invading the graft and replacing it. The foreign cells disintegrate rapidly and by the 22d day have practically all disappeared. The period at which the established graft begins to degenerate, namely the 19th to the 20th day of incubation, is the one on which grafts of foreign tissue will no longer take when implanted in the embryo. The cells at the edge of the graft of foreign tissue survive for a time. There is a rapid formation of a connective tissue capsule and an invasion of the grafts. The foreign cells here practically all have disappeared by the 22d day, leaving a mass of connective tissue. The absence of a round cell infiltration is the most marked difference in the process in the embryo as compared with that in the adult chicken. The process about the grafts in newly hatched chicks is characterized by a more active response of the connective tissue than in the adult and a more pronounced round cell infiltration than in the embryo.
Infection of rats and mice with Bacillus tuberculosis (bovine type) develops a splenic tumor as a typical lesion. Removal of the spleen from mice (albino) greatly increases their resistance to the infection. This increased resistance cannot be explained at present. The infection in the splenectomized mice tends to remain localized as contrasted with an almost septicemic type of disease which is usual in the normal animal. The animals of each group that live more than thirty days are apt to present typical exudative lesions. The removal of the spleen does not therefore grossly change what may be called the capacity of the body for exudation.
A strain of the poliomyelitic virus was propagated in monkeys for four years, during which time it displayed three distinct phases of virulence. The several phases covered different periods of time. At the outset the virulence was low, but by animal passages it quickly rose to a maximum; this maximum was maintained for about three years, when, without known changes in the external conditions, a diminution set in and increased until at the expiration of a few months the degree of virulence about equalled that present at the beginning of the passages in monkeys. The cycle of changes in virulence is correlated with the wave-like fluctuation in epidemics of disease which also consist of a rise, temporary maximum, and fall in the number of cases prevailing. And an explanation of epidemics of disease is inferred in variations or mutations among the microörganismal causes of disease affecting chiefly the quality of their virulence.
The virus of poliomyelitis is neurotropic, and localizes, and probably is capable of multiplying in the extramedullary parenchymatous nervous organs. It has been demonstrated by inoculation tests in the intervertebral, Gasserian, and abdominal sympathetic ganglia. All the ganglia show histological lesions, more or less severe, similar to those of the spinal cord and brain. The severest occur in the intervertebral ganglia, those next in severity in the Gasserian, while the mildest appear in the abdominal sympathetic ganglia. The interstitial lesions predominate over the parenchymatous, and in preparalytic stages the intervertebral ganglia show interstitial lesions, especially pronounced at the pial covering. Epidemic poliomyelitis is a general disease of the nervous system, although the most prominent and important symptoms are those following injury to the motor neurones of the spinal cord and brain. The virus of poliomyelitis is highly resistant to glycerin, in which it survives for more than two years; to 0.5 per cent. phenol, in which it survives for more than one year; while it succumbs after having been kept frozen constantly for several months. It is unsafe to employ phenol to modify the virus of poliomyelitis for the purpose of active immunization. The cerebrospinal fluid of convalescents tends to be devoid of the neutralizing immunity principles for the virus of poliomyelitis, although they may exceptionally be present within this fluid. Doubtless the immunity principles are not produced locally in the nervous tissues, but elsewhere in the body, and are carried to the nervous organs by the blood.
The globoid bodies, or minute microörganisms, cultivated from the central nervous organs of human beings and monkeys that have succumbed to poliomyelitis, may be detected in the incubated brain tissues of infected monkeys in forms indicating post-mortem multiplication. Incubating the poliomyelitic tissues in kidney-ascitic fluid culture medium and then crushing them is a more certain method for obtaining cultures of the organism. Identical bodies have been detected in blood films prepared on the twelfth day of the acute attack, from a paralyzed poliomyelitic monkey inoculated intraspinously. The same organism has been cultivated from the blood of a monkey that had received intravenously a large dose of a Berkefeld filtrate of poliomyelitic virus. No other microörganisms were detected either in the sections of the brain or in film preparations of the blood. These observations tend therefore to confirm the etiological relationship between the minute microörganism and epidemic poliomyelitis suggested by the successful cultivation and inoculation experiments reported by Flexner and Noguchi.
By intraspinous injections of specimens of poliomyelitic virus of suitable virulence infection can be caused regularly in Macacus rhesus monkeys. The virus passes from the subarachnoid spaces into the nervous tissues in which it multiplies, and into the blood. The constant involvement of the pia-arachnoid membranes in poliomyelitis, even when no paralysis occurs, and the fact that infection can readily be produced by intraspinous inoculation suggests anew that in the pathogenesis of poliomyelitis the interstitial tissue changes within the meninges, blood vessels, and ground substance play a determining part. While the virus injected into the subarachnoid spaces can be demonstrated there by inoculation tests forty-eight hours after the injection it can no longer be detected on the sixth day, at a time when the first symptoms of infection make their appearance. The failure of the cerebrospinal fluid from human and experimental cases of poliomyelitis to produce the disease when inoculated into monkeys is due to the fact that the virus is either fixed by the nervous tissues or passes into the blood.
Splenectomy in the dog causes, as a rule, a transformation of the fatty marrow of the long bones to a richly cellular red marrow. During the early periods, one to three months, the change in the marrow is slight and either focal or peripheral; after six to twenty months the replacement of fat by marrow cells is complete or nearly so. Exceptions were, however, seen in four animals representing the 8th, 9th, 10th, and 22d months, respectively. The evidence at hand does not support the theory that this hyperplasia is compensatory either to the anemia caused by splenectomy or to an increased hemolysis in the lymph nodes. It is possible that it may be a concomitant of the activity of the bone marrow in taking over, in the absence of the spleen, the function of storing and elaborating the iron of old blood pigment for future utilization by new red cells, but our studies do not fully support this view.
These experiments show that it is possible to perform an operation, the object of which is to increase the circumference of the pulmonary orifice without involving much danger to the life of the animal. It is probable that operations of this type may come to be employed in the treatment of stenosis of the pulmonary artery in man.
1. The unsaturated lipoids (serum antitrypsin) can be adsorbed from guinea pig serum, rabbit serum, and horse serum by kaolin, starch, agar, and bacteria. 2. Diphtheria toxin and cobra venom also reduce the serum antitrypsin, possibly because of their affinity for lipoids. 3. Anaphylatoxins represent sera rendered toxic by partial removal of serum antitrypsin. 4. The matrix of the protein split products lies in the serum proteins so exposed. 5. The amount of removal of serum antitrypsin depends on definite quantitative relations; very large amounts and very small amounts of adsorbing substances are least effective (kaolin, starch, and bacteria). 6. Bacteria previously treated with serum or with oils do not adsorb serum antitrypsin. 7. Bacteria treated with serum become more resistant to the action of trypsin.
1. From a comparison of the results with arthritis deformans recorded in tables III, IV, and VI, and with the control cases recorded in table VII, one is justified in concluding that Streptococcus viridans is an infectious agent and excites the production of a complement-fixing substance (fixateur) in the organism in cases of arthritis deformans, and, therefore, Streptococcus viridans is the probable causative agent of the disease in many cases of arthritis deformans. Probably 40 per cent. and more of cases of arthritis deformans should be considered as chronic infective deforming arthritis. 2. Rarely the clinical manifestations of arthritis deformans may be due to gonococcus infection. 3. The serum from one case may react positively to two different organisms, most frequently to Streptococcus viridans and to gonococcus, when the reaction to the former should be considered the indicator of the causative agent, since with the latter infection is often latent in the genito-urinary tract. Incidence of gonococcus infection is high and the clinical manifestations of arthritis deformans are rarely produced by gonococcus infection.
1. Streptococcus viridans is of extremely low virulence for white mice and rabbits. 2. The serum of rabbits, after a series of intravenous injections of dead or living Streptococcus viridans, is poor in complement fixative substance (fixateur of Besredka) for Streptococcus viridans. 3. Antigens prepared from several strains of Streptococcus viridans are relatively poor in fixable substance. 4. The technique of complement fixation tests for infection with Streptococcus viridans is so laborious and difficult that the method will not be available for general clinical work.
The determination of the percentage of CO(2) in the alveolar air, by the method of Haldane and Priestley, is sufficiently accurate for clinical purposes when the individual is at rest. It is evident, however, that an error may arise in the determination of the percentage of CO(2) in the alveolar air, due to the time during the forced expiration, short of the extreme limit, at which the sample may be unconsciously taken. This error can only be overcome by taking several samples. In individuals at rest having a tidal air below 425 cubic centimeters, the method of Douglas and Haldane for the calculation of the dead space gives approximately accurate results; with a tidal air above 425 cubic centimeters the results obtained may be wholly inaccurate. In patients with marked pulmonary tuberculosis so slight an effort as that involved in collecting the expired air tends to lower the percentage of CO(2) in the alveolar air. In collecting the expired air by the rubber bag method, it is absolutely essential that the bag be washed out with ordinary atmospheric air after every observation.
Incision, suture, and cauterization of the sigmoid valves of the pulmonary artery have been performed successfully in dogs. In the first series of ten animals, there were only three accidents, probably from largely preventable causes, leading to the death of the animals.
1. The blood of the splenic artery and vein shows either no differences, or only such slight irregular variations as may be due to the errors inherent in hematologic methods, or are common to arterial and venous blood of the general circulation. 2. The observation of Banti and Furno that free hemoglobin occurs in the blood of the splenic vein is not confirmed. 3. Extracts of the spleen have no definite hemolytic action in vitro. 4. Intraperitoneal injection of fresh saline extracts of the spleen causes in the dog a sharp increase in the number of red cells and the hemoglobin content which lasts for one or two days and may recur on a second injection. Extracts of liver, kidney, and erythrocytes similarly prepared do not give this effect. This observation supports Danilewsky's theory that the spleen may exert a stimulating effect upon the formation of red cells in the bone marrow. 5. On the other hand, the feeding of raw beef spleen to splenectomized dogs over long periods of time has no clearly defined influence in preventing the anemia which usually follows splenectomy.
Our studies give evidence of increase in the iron elimination in three of five dogs during a period of two weeks following splenectomy, but not in two other dogs. The occasional increased output of iron may have some relation to the anemia which occurs in the early weeks after splenectomy and which varies in degree in different animals. No evidence was secured of an increase in the iron output at 1, 9, and 20 months after splenectomy. From our own studies and from examination of the literature of the subject, we conclude that the spleen does not exercise a constant and important influence upon the iron metabolism of the body.
For the first few days of cultivation of connective tissue in hypertonic, hypotonic, and diluted medium, cell proliferation was stimulated. The first outgrowths of new cells in the modified media did not occur sooner than in normal medium. In hypertonic medium the density of the area of cell proliferation appeared to be greater than the control, but in hypotonic or diluted medium there seemed to be no increase in actual mass over the control. These observations confirm the conclusions of Carrel and Burrows, as well as those of Lambert. Subsequent to the first few days of cultivation in hypertonic medium the area of cell proliferation decreased and in a short time conditions developed which were unfavorable to growth, and finally resulted in death of the culture, unless it revived before this stage. Hypotonic medium after about ten days no longer caused more extensive areas of proliferating cells; but instead, the extent of new growth gradually decreased, and the culture merely remained alive unless revived. In diluted medium the extent of the area of cell proliferation remained greater with no actual increase in mass. The area of cell proliferation which is observed during the first few days in a culture of fresh tissue recently extirpated does not indicate the actual influence of modified media. It was only after continued cultivation of strains of connective tissue in these modified media that their influence on cell proliferation was determined.
We may devise a fluid containing practically all the inorganic diffusible constituents of the blood except calcium, and use it to dialyze normal blood in such a way as to remove from it a large part of its calcium. The dialyzed blood when perfused through an isolated extremity produces an extreme hyperexcitability of the nerves quite like that observed in tetany. Since perfusion with blood dialyzed in precisely the same way against a fluid of the same composition, but containing calcium in the proportion found in the normal blood, causes no hyperexcitability of the nerves, it is evident that the hyperexcitability is due to the lack of calcium. This effect can be attained in only a slight degree by replacing the blood of a whole animal with the dialyzed blood, since under the conditions of the experiment the tissues cannot be sufficiently depleted of their calcium. It seems probable that the parathyroid secretion is not removed by dialysis, but is returned to the body with the dialyzed blood. To bring this result into relation with the condition in tetany following parathyroidectomy, animals in tetany were bled and the blood was replaced in one case with normal blood, in the other with dialyzed blood poor in calcium. The normal blood immediately relieves the tetany and lowers the excitability, while the dialyzed blood does not. We therefore believe that this is a further proof that in the tetany of parathyroidectomy also the twitching and hyperexcitability of the nerves is due to lack of calcium in the blood and tissues.
Through the intravenous injection of various substances differing very much in character, multiple necrosis can be produced in the liver of the guinea pig. In the mouse the effect of these substances is absent or much less marked. Different substances seem to differ, however, in their power to produce necrosis. In control animals necrosis in the liver is much more rare. It is found especially in animals subjected to various injurious influences. The necrotic areas are usually situated between the portal and central areas of the liver acini. Their development is not due to thromboses interfering with the circulation in certain areas of the liver. They are probably due to a weakening of the circulation in the liver or to interference with the metabolism of the cells as a result of the injection of foreign substances. Mechanical factors (pressure on the liver cells) may have an additional effect. This necrosis may be compared etiologically to the acute gastric ulcers which can be produced through a great variety of toxic substances in the guinea pig.
If six to seven days after copulation incisions are made under ether anesthesia into the uterus, and on the day following this operation one or several injections of hirudin are given, changes set in in the ovaries which correspond to those found at the time of ovulation; namely, a degeneration of all the follicles with the exception of the small ones. These degenerative changes are followed by the same developmental changes as in the normal cycle. This represents a second method of altering experimentally the periodicity of the sexual cycle, the first consisting in the early extirpation of the corpora lutea described previously by one of us. Under the same conditions intravenous injections of hirudin destroy in the large majority of cases the greater part of experimental placentomata through hemorrhages, and they prevent the remaining placentomatous areas from active proliferation, probably as a result of interference with the circulation. These injections may also cause abortion in pregnant animals. Intravenous injections of hirudin produce a tendency to hemorrhage at various places in the body, and these hemorrhages are prone to occur, especially in rapidly growing tissues, where the blood vessels are less resistant, as in tumors and in placentomata, also in the neighborhood of necrotic areas. In the stomach the hemorrhages may be followed by digestion of the tissues through the gastric juice. It is probable that there is a connection between the action of hirudin on the blood (coagulability and viscosity) and the tendency to hemorrhage. Withdrawal of blood, intravenous injections of distilled water, colloidal copper, nucleoproteid, or casein have no marked effect on the cyclic changes in the ovaries or on placentomata.
During the first four or five days after ligation of the ureter, the changes in the kidney are mainly degenerative in type. One week after ligation of the ureter connective tissue cells begin to appear infiltrating the kidney tissues. There is also an increase in the vascular cells of the glomeruli. These changes are well marked at the end of twenty days from the time of ligation. At the end of twenty days from the time of ligation there is also a marked hypertrophy of the control kidney, the glomeruli showing an average increase in size of twenty-five microns.
Diet exerts a profound influence upon the toxicity (tested in the omnivorous white rat) of certain substances, namely, chloroform, phosphorus, potassium chromate, and uranium nitrate, which cause necrosis of the parenchymatous cells of the liver or of the kidney. Susceptibility to intoxication with all of these substances is less after a diet rich in carbohydrate than after a diet consisting of meat. Carbohydrates protect the parenchymatous cells of the liver or of the kidneys from necrosis caused by any one of these substances. Chloroform is much more toxic to animals which have received a diet consisting in great part of fat than to those which have received meat. When fat is fed to the white rat fatty infiltration occurs in the centers of the hepatic lobules and in the loops of Henle of the kidney. The necrosis caused by chloroform has the same location. The solubility of chloroform in fat determines the increased susceptibility of animals which have received fat and stored it in the parenchymatous cells of the liver and kidney. Susceptibility to intoxication with phosphorus which causes fatty degeneration and necrosis of the liver is not increased by a diet of fat. Necrosis caused by phosphorus occurs in the periphery of the hepatic lobule and exhibits maximum intensity in animals which have received meat. Susceptibility to intoxication with potassium chromate which causes nephritis with necrosis of the convoluted tubules of the kidney is not greater after a diet of fat than after a diet of meat. Susceptibility to intoxication with uranium nitrate which causes nephritis with advanced necrosis of renal tubules is increased by a diet of fat. The loops of Henle, in which fat is abundant after a diet of fat, are the chief site of necrosis.
Sixty-nine positive cultures were obtained from sixty-nine specimens of sputum from practically all stages of tuberculosis. Six of these specimens were negative by direct microscopic examination, but the cultures gave positive findings. These six specimens have been positive for tubercle bacilli at some time. Nineteen positive cultures were isolated from thirty-two specimens of feces. All these thirty-two specimens, upon direct microscopical examination, gave positive findings, some showing only a few tubercle bacilli. Six specimens were not free from contaminating organisms, and the remaining seven were negative. The method presented in this paper has proved very simple and accurate for the isolation of tubercle bacilli from sputum. The partial success in isolating tubercle bacilli from feces may be due to the fact that many of the bacilli may be dead.
The monkey (Macacus rhesus) usually tolerates readily the repeated intraspinal injection of large doses of 0.3 per cent. tricresol antimeningitis serum. The spontaneous respiration is generally not disturbed. Doses of 0.3 per cent. tricresol serum as large as 8 c.c. per kilo were injected intraspinally with subsequent recovery, even when the monkey had a partial pneumothorax. Dangerous alterations of the respiration and blood pressure in the monkey after 0.3 per cent. tricresol serum given by syringe are apparently largely due to increased intraspinal pressure, for the mere reduction of this pressure has sufficed to bring about a prompt and complete recovery. The medullary centers of the monkey (vagus, respiratory, and vasomotor) are highly resistant to the action of sera when injected intraspinally, strikingly more so than those of the dog. Occasionally the mere introduction of a hypodermic needle into the spinal dural sac of non-anesthetized, unoperated monkeys which have already received injections of 0.3 per cent. tricresol serum, may produce a severe collapse. A preceding partial asphyxia seems to be a necessary condition. Large quantities of sera are rapidly absorbed from the spinal dural sac of monkeys, and the clotting time of the blood is decreased. The spinal meninges of the monkey are resistant to infection; even primitive precautions during intraspinal injections apparently suffice to prevent infection. Dogs are much more sensitive to the intraspinal injection of 0.3 per cent. tricresol serum than monkeys; nevertheless they may tolerate as much as 6 c.c. per kilo provided that intratracheal insufflation is maintained for some time after each injection. The chief danger in dogs after intraspinal injections of 0.3 per cent. tricresol is a cessation of the respiration; for this reason artificial respiration is necessary. The blood pressure in the dog may be profoundly lowered by 0.3 per cent. tricresol serum, yet recovery is usually obtained if intratracheal insufflation is maintained. The effects of 0.3 per cent. tricresol serum upon the medullary centers is interpreted to be the result of either excitatory or inhibitory stimuli. No evidence was found that either the respiratory, vasomotor, or vagus center is paralyzed. The local application of 0.3 per cent. tricresol serum upon the exposed medulla of dogs does not produce the same effect upon the respiration and blood pressure as intraspinal injection of the same serum. A solution of 0.3 per cent. tricresol serum applied locally to the medulla of dogs occasionally produces a transient respiratory stop page, without markedly affecting the blood pressure even when intratracheal insufflation is stopped. Increased intraspinal pressure was found to be an important factor in the production of respiratory and blood pressure changes in the dog after intraspinal injection of 0.3 per cent. tricresol serum. Both in the monkey and in the dog 0.3 per cent. chloroform serum, 0.3 per cent. ether serum, or plain horse serum produced in general a smaller effect upon the medullary centers than 0.3 per cent. tricresol serum. The ideal preservative for therapeutic sera would seem to be one which could be removed before injection. Ether in this respect is better than chloroform. The opsonins in antimeningitis serum are about equally affected by 0.3 per cent. tricresol, 0.3 per cent. chloroform, or 0.3 per cent. ether when tested after one week, one month, and three months. When intraspinal injections are given in the human being it would seem advisable to be prepared to withdraw part of the injected fluid and to administer artificial respiration, if necessary. For a safe withdrawal of fluid the gravity method is the best; for artificial respiration Meltzer's apparatus for pharyngeal insufflation is recommended.
The resistance to an infection with the tubercle bacillus which can be given to mice by the removal of the spleen is lost when fresh spleen, either of mouse or sheep, is added to the diet. The logical conclusion that splenic function in its relation to the specific infection is restored by feeding spleen cannot, however, be drawn; because, in the first place, the character of the disease in the splenectomized spleen-fed animals differs somewhat from that in intact animals; and, secondly, because fresh spleen when fed to splenectomized animals apparently gives rise to an acute intoxication. This intoxication occurs quite regularly in mice. It is manifested in the infected animals and in those not inoculated. It has been seen in one of two splenectomized dogs experimented upon. Up to the present it can hardly be definitely characterized, but it seems to be best marked out by the specific anorexia associated with it.
The minute microörganism cultivated from poliomyelitic tissues survives and maintains its pathogenicity in cultures for more than one year. Upon inoculation into monkeys poliomyelitis may fail to appear upon the first injection and yet follow from the effects of successive injections of the culture. Inoculations of cultures into monkeys which fail to produce paralysis may fail also to induce resistance or immunity. In this respect the action of the cultures resembles that of the virus as contained in infected nervous tissues. The lesions occurring in the spinal cord, medulla, and intervertebral ganglia of the monkeys which respond to the several inoculations of the cultures are identical with those present in the nervous organs of the animals responding to injection of the ordinary virus. Glycerinated nervous tissues derived from the monkeys responding to several injections of the cultures transmit experimental poliomyelitis to monkeys upon intracerebral inoculation. The microörganism inoculated may be recovered in cultures from the monkeys which develop poliomyelitis; but cultivation from the brain tissue is attended with the usual difficulties surrounding the obtaining of the initial growth. The microörganism cultivated from poliomyelitic tissues is adapted with difficulty to saprophytic conditions of multiplication, but once adapted growth readily takes place upon suitable media. When, however, as a result of inoculation into monkeys, the parasitic propensities of the microörganism are restored, it again displays the marked fastidiousness to artificial conditions of multiplication present at the original isolation. The experiments reported in this paper afford additional strong evidence in support of the view already expressed, that this microorganism bears an etiological relationship to epidemic poliomyelitis in the human subject and to experimental poliomyelitis in the monkey.
This report gives an outline of the results of observations on over 1,100 tissue cultures made during the fall, winter, and spring of 1913 to 1914. The work has been resumed in the fall of 1914 and will be continued along the same and allied lines, confirming the above results with other strains of the same organisms and with other bacteria and bacterial products. Tests should be made with tissue and plasma from other animals, and the known pathogenicity of the organism for the animal and tissue used should always be borne in mind. We hope to be able to grow on these cultures some of the more strictly parasitic bacteria not developing on ordinary media, as other strict parasites have been grown by other workers, viz., poliomyelitis virus by Levaditi (4), vaccinia by Steinhardt, Israeli, and Lambert (5), and rabies by Moon (6). By comparative studies with various types of cells and various natural and artificial media, clearer ideas as to the exact part of cell plasma in antibody production, by elaborating on the methods of Carrel and Ingebrigtsen (7), Lüdke (8), Przygode (9), and others, should be possible. After this work was begun a reference was found to the use of some pathogenic bacteria in tissue cultures by Pheiler and Lentz (10), but no publication of the results of these observations has been observed. The results here reported may be summarized as follows: Bactericidal Action of Chicken Plasma.-On Bacillus typhosus, very strong-never grows in plasma alone; on Bacillus prodigiosus, very strong-never grows in plasma alone; on Bacterium pseudodiphtheriticum, strong-slight growth in cover-glass preparations; on Bacterium diphtheriticum, moderately strong; on Bacillus coli verus, slight; on Micrococcus aureus, very slight or none. A few pseudodiphtheria bacilli and more diphtheria bacilli survived in plasma stored in the cold for four days. The presence of growing tissue overcomes the bactericidal influence of plasma on diphtheria bacilli and in some instances on pseudodiphtheria bacilli. Bacterium diphtheriticum grows in plasma without tissue only if inoculations are very heavy; and very heavy inoculations of all organisms will probably overcome the bactericidal action of plasma, as it is undoubtedly a quantitative reaction. The bactericidal influence of plasma is overcome by exposure to incubator temperature for twenty-four to forty-eight hours. Bacterium diphtheriticum in light or moderate inoculations grows in tissue cultures only in clusters around the tissue fragments, and never in plasma away from tissue. The growth of this organism has a decided inhibitory influence on tissue activity and growth, especially marked with nervous tissue, but this action may be overcome by the addition of antitoxin to the plasma. Cultures inhibited by diphtheria growth have a tendency to resume growth later, probably due to antitoxin production. Bacterium pseudodiphtheriticum is distinctly less active in tissue cultures than is Bacterium diphtheriticum and never develops in plasma without tissue. The presence of diphtheria toxin in tissue cultures causes this organism to behave as does Bacterium diphtheriticum. Without toxin it has little or no direct influence on tissue growth except in massive doses. Bacillus prodigiosus fails to develop, as a rule, in tissue cultures except where inoculated from hypertonic media, and then it has no decided influence on tissue growth. Micrococcus aureus grows freely in these cultures with or without tissue, and inhibits tissue growth markedly, except as noted with splenic tissue. Bacillus coli verus always grows freely with or without tissue fragments and is uninfluenced by splenic tissue growth. In heavy inoculations it lessens tissue growth. Bacillus typhosus, except with extremely heavy inoculations, fails absolutely to grow in these cultures with or without plasma, unless the bactericidal action of the plasma has been destroyed by incubation. When this is the case it develops freely with especial affinity for the tissue cells either for support or nourishment. It appears to have no toxic action on the tissue cells. Note the sharp differentiation between typhoid and coli verus organisms. Diphtheria toxin has a quantitatively inhibiting action on all tissue growth and on heart tissue pulsations, the action being greatest on nervous tissue and least on heart tissue growth. Tissues affected by toxin tend to recovery if not killed. Antitoxin counteracts the action of toxin. Splenic tissue has little or no effect on the growth of Bacillus coli verus, but has a decided bactericidal action on Bacterium diphtheriticum and Micrococcus aureus, probably due to lymphatic cells and cell products, as seen by the area of cell migration coinciding with the bacteria-free area, by the similar action of splenic extract on cultures, and by the failure of such action in cultures of very early splenic tissue showing no lymphatic cells.
A study of pneumococci isolated from individuals suffering from lobar pneumonia has shown that the majority of these organisms fall into definite biological groups. These groups have been arbitrarily numbered from I to IV. The first three groups consist of organisms which within the group are closely related to each other by certain immunological reactions; i. e., protection and agglutination. Extensive study has failed to reveal crossing in either of these reactions between members of separate groups. The fourth group is formed of a series of independent varieties which cannot be definitely related to one another by the immune reactions employed. Up to the present time we have observed no tendency of these organisms to lose their specific characters, nor have we observed a change of one type into another. These groups vary in their pathogenicity for human beings, and in the order of their virulence are as follows: group III, group II, group I, group IV. The degree of protective power developed in the sera of animals immunized against members of the different groups varies inversely with the virulence and with the amount of capsular development. This, however, applies only to tests of passive immunity. The highly virulent groups give as good active immunity as those of lower virulence, if not better. In view of these constant differential characters of the pneumococcus, it was deemed advisable to study the pneumococci occurring in normal sputum. It has been commonly assumed that infection in pneumonia is autogenic, and occurs from the invasion of the lungs by a pneumococcus habitually carried in the mouth. If this is so, we should find the same types in the normal mouth as occur during the disease. Examination of a series of normal individuals showed this not to be the case. In no instance was an organism found which could be grouped with any of the fixed types of pneumococcus. All exhibited the same characters as those organisms obtained from lobar pneumonia which belong to group IV. Inasmuch as organisms belonging to this group are of low virulence, and are responsible in our experience for only 20 per cent. of the cases of pneumonia, it is at once manifest that the majority and more virulent cases of pneumonia are due to organisms which are not found in normal mouths. To gain further evidence of this difference, a study has been made of convalescents from pneumonia who had been infected by typical organisms. During the period of recovery these typical organisms are supplanted by the type which occurs in normal mouths. The period of disappearance of the typical varieties has varied. The shortest time in which disappearance has occurred has been twelve days, and the longest period in which typical organisms have been carried has been ninety days. In the latter instance the patient was lost sight of, so that he may well have carried the virulent form for a longer period of time. In general, when typical organisms persist for a long time, there is delay in the healing of the lung lesion. If recovery is prompt, as a rule the virulent types disappear rapidly. We have said that the virulent types do not occur in normal mouths. There are exceptions to this observation. In a number of instances organisms belonging to the typical groups have been isolated from the mouth sputum of healthy individuals. So far this has occurred only in individuals intimately in contact with cases of lobar pneumonia. Wherever typical organisms have been obtained under such circumstances, the type has always corresponded to that with which the case of pneumonia was infected. Such individuals, therefore, become infected with virulent types of pneumococcus by contact, and may be regarded as healthy carriers of disease-producing types. This study makes it probable that the majority of cases of pneumonia are dependent upon either direct or indirect contact with a previous case. Mere infection of the mouth by virulent types is by no means sufficient to cause the disease. In order to invade the lungs, these virulent types must find the circumstances favorable, or a suitable condition must arise during the period when they are harbored in the mouth. Comparative study of certain strains of pneumococci received from South Africa suggests that new groups of parasitic organisms develop only during the period of high racial susceptibility. A like condition of affairs is brought about when a group of hitherto unexposed individuals is brought into contact with an infectious microörganism. The development of racial immunity soon limits the number of new types which may arise. The suggestion is made that strictly parasitic races of microorganisms are pure lines and have established themselves as parasites during a period of high racial susceptibility.
The immune bodies of antipneumococcus serum are completely precipitated by 38 to 42 per cent. saturation with ammonium sulphate. They are incompletely precipitated by (a) ammonium sulphate in less than 38 per cent. saturation, (b) saturation with sodium chloride, (c) dilution and saturation with carbon dioxide, (d) removal of crystalloids by dialysis. The immune bodies of antipneumococcus serum are, therefore, associated or combined with that fraction of the globulins precipitated by 38 to 42 per cent. saturation with ammonium sulphate. The immune body fraction does not correspond exactly with the ordinary euglobulin (one-third saturation with ammonium sulphate or complete saturation with sodium chloride) or with the insoluble globulins precipitated by carbon dioxide or dialysis. These fractions carry with them only a part of the immune bodies. Neither the albumin nor that fraction of the globulin not precipitated by 38 to 42 per cent. saturation of ammonium sulphate contain any of the demonstrable antibodies. The most promising method for the practical purification of the immune bodies occurring in antipneumococcus serum appears to be precipitation by 38 to 42 per cent. saturation with ammonium sulphate.
Our later investigations confirm our previous results. 1. It is possible to increase markedly the effect of substances inhibiting tumor growth by using certain combinations of these substances which, when given alone, have some effect on tumor growth. 2. Immunity acquired against the effect of these substances depends partly upon an active immunization of the tumor cells themselves against the action of these substances, and this immunity is transmitted to the following generations of tumor cells. 3. The immunity against the substances inhibiting tumor growth is, as far as we have investigated the problem, specific. 4. Our later experiments provide a more secure basis for the additional and more general conclusions which we mentioned tentatively in our previous paper.
If we now consider briefly the principal results of our investigation, we can, in comparing the behavior of the thyroid after auto- and homeoplastic transplantation, in general recognize three stages. In the first stage, comprising the first 4 to 5 days after transplantation, there is no noticeable difference between the auto- and homeograft; both corresponding pieces behave in the main alike; large parts of both grafts become necrotic in the center; the necrosis begins shortly after the transplantation and concerns only a part of the periphery; here a narrow zone of thyroid tissue is left; it consists of one to two rows of partly well recognizable follicles. After 48 hours the first fibroblasts, polynuclear leucocytes, and lymphocytes appear in the tissue surrounding the grafts. After 72 hours these elements are present also in the center of the thyroid tissue. At the same date the first mitoses appear in the follicular epithelium; their number is, however, as yet small, but it increases markedly during the following days. After 4 days are found the first newly formed follicles, and from now on their number is increasing. Colloid is present only in small amounts in the old follicles. The central necrotic area still persists, but the masses of detritus are becoming smaller, while the number of fibroblasts and lymphocytes in the necrotic part is increasing; new blood vessels are also visible in the necrotic center. The second stage, the stage of transition, extends over the next seven days. The earliest, at first slight, differences between the auto- and homeograft appear after 5 days; the difference is usually very definite after 12 days. During this time there is an increase in the number of follicles in the autograft and correspondingly a decrease in the size of the necrotic central area, which is caused by a gradually progressing removal of the necrotic material in the center of the piece. The follicles are lined with a high cylindrical epithelium, which contains numerous mitoses. The number of mitoses increases markedly after the 4th day and reaches a maximum between the 7th and 9th days. Newly produced colloid is always present in the autograft after the 8th day; in the newly formed follicles the colloid contains numerous vacuoles and is almost never retracted, in contradistinction to the solid retracted colloid in the old follicles, which probably was present in the follicles at the time of transplantation. At the end of this period the central part is almost entirely freed from the necrotic masses and is filled with loosely arranged connective tissue cells, between which isolated lymphocytes and polynuclear leucocytes can be found. It contains also numerous blood vessels and brown blood pigment cells. After 5 days, with the beginning of the second stage, the first as yet rather insignificant differences become noticeable in the homeotransplants. They are as follows: (1) The number of lymphocytes is much larger in the homeo- than in the autograft. (2) The fibroblasts are increased in the central area and these fibroblasts form here very soon firm connective tissue bundles; they surround also the individual follicles or small groups of follicles and form fibrous bands, which are at this stage still very small. During the following days the number of lymphocytes increases and the fibrous connective tissue becomes more prominent, so that 7, 9, 10, and 11 days after transplantation numerous follicles are not only destroyed by the surrounding and invading lymphocytes, but in addition a part of the follicles is encircled and compressed by wide connective tissue bands. This compression is especially distinct in the central parts of the homeografts. At this stage the absence of a well developed vascular system is already noticeable in the central parts of the homeografts. It is especially noteworthy that the follicles of the homeograft which escaped destruction by the lymphocytes and connective tissue are as well preserved as in the autograft. Colloid is usually present in smaller amounts than in the autografts, even in the well preserved follicles of the homeografts. It must, however, be stated that some variations occur in this stage in the degree of destruction of the homeotransplanted pieces. Side by side with pieces in which a marked destruction has taken place, there are other pieces which suffered as yet relatively little. But some of the above mentioned differences between the auto- and homeotransplants are always present to a smaller or larger extent. There are also certain variations in the relative strength, with which lymphocytes and connective tissue injure the follicles; in some homeotransplants the attacks on the part of the lymphocytes prevail, while in others those on the part of the connective tissue are more prominent. The homeotransplants, which are relatively little injured at this stage are spared only to be subject to a stronger attack on the part of the lymphocytes and connective tissue during the following stage. The third stage begins approximately with the 12th day. From now on the difference between auto- and homeograft is sharply defined. In the autografts the regeneration of the thyroid tissue is steadily progressing and is nearly complete after 21 days. After this date the autograft represents throughout the picture of the normal thyroid gland; well developed follicles filled with colloid are surrounded by a very scant connective tissue. Mitoses, which begin already to decrease after the 9th day, are still present at the end of 17 days, but absent after this date. The small amount of loosely built, usually centrally located connective tissue, has no tendency to undergo a fibrous or hyaline change and does nowhere exert a compression on the follicles. It contains always a large number of blood vessels and only a few lymphocytes. In the homeograft the secondary destruction of the follicles is progressing with great intensity after the 12th day. In contradistinction to a primary degeneration of the follicles, due to the action of substances circulating in the body fluids, which might have been expected to take place, but which in reality does not occur, and which would be followed only secondarily by a connective tissue proliferation and lymphocytic invasion, we may speak of the destruction by means of lymphocytes and connective tissue, which actually does take place, as a secondary destruction of the follicles. This secondary mode of destruction of the follicles through lymphocytes and connective tissue is found exclusively in the homeotransplant. Following this destruction the larger part of the homeografts is occupied by a fibrous, hyaline connective tissue, in which remnants of destroyed follicles in the form of clefts filled with lymphocytes are seen. In several cases the destruction of follicles through lymphocytes, which accumulate in large numbers around the follicles and destroy them very actively, prevails; in other cases the compression of the follicles through fibrous, hyaline connective tissue predominates; in other cases both factors may be about equally active. The few peripheral follicles which escaped destruction are small, probably as a result of compression through the connective tissue; but they may still show normal epithelium and nuclei and may occasionally contain traces of colloid. Newly formed colloid is not present in the homeotransplants at the third stage. It should also be mentioned that the blood supply of the homeografts, especially after the 12th day, is very much restricted and that the blood vessels are mainly located in the connective tissue surrounding the graft, and not in the central connective tissue, which exists here in a much larger quantity and is much denser than in the autograft. At this stage also we find considerable variations in the extent of the injuries, in the individual follicles. But no piece escapes the attack entirely, and those which remain relatively well preserved for a certain period will be attacked at a later date by the connective tissue, as well as by the lymphocytes of the host. To summarize briefly, the principal result: For a short period of time after operation no difference is seen in the behavior of the thyroid after auto- and homeotransplantation. Very soon, however, a destruction of follicles begins to take place in the homeografts. This destruction is not caused by a direct primary disintegration or solution of follicles, but depends on the destructive activity of (1) the lymphocytes, and (2) of the connective tissue of the host tissue. The former invade the follicles and destroy them directly; the latter grows into the homeografts in larger quantity than into the autografts. In the former it soon becomes fibrous and hyaline; in the latter it remains cellular. The fibrous connective tissue surrounds and compresses and thus destroys the follicles. In some homeografts destruction by means of lymphocytes, in others by connective tissue, preponderates. The rapidity with which the destruction takes place in different homeotransplants also varies. A much better blood vessel supply develops in the autograft than in the homeograft.
Cholesterol, in 0.1 gram amounts, melted in a compact mass and inserted into the subcutaneous tissues of the back of the guinea pig, is slowly removed, as determined by chemical analyses. The rate of removal is probably greatly dependent upon the physical state of the cholesterol. The quantitative estimation of cholesterol by the method previously described can not be shortened and simplified by the direct saponification of the tissues by means of 5 per cent. sodium alcoholate or a strong (50 per cent.) solution of sodium hydroxide, instead of saponifying the alcohol-ether extract.
The relative difficulty with which the characteristic central lobular liver necrosis can be produced in young pups after chloroform administration is in some way referable to the high glycogen contents of their livers. Evidence for this conclusion lies in the following facts: 1. Pups can readily be made to show the central liver necrosis which is found in chloroform poisoning in adults, if, prior to the administration of chloroform, they have been starved or starved and made diabetic by phlorhizin. 2. A single quantitative experiment showed that the liver of a normal, well nourished pup, twenty-four hours old, contained as much as 9.07 per cent. of glycogen. 3. The feeding of carbohydrates to adult animals lessens their susceptibility to the production of liver necrosis by chloroform.
1. In cases in which great inequalities in the blood flow in the two hands were produced by mechanical causes (ligation or compression of vessels, embolism), the stability of the ratio of the flows, in successive measurements at short intervals, was found to be characteristic. Over long intervals the opening up of collateral circulation or the progressive increase of the block (in a case of multiple embolism with thrombosis) was followed by changes in the ratio of the blood flows in the normal and the affected part. Another criterion of these conditions was found to be that the inequality was not abolished by producing general vasomotor changes; e. g., by altering the external temperature. 2. In certain cases inequalities in the blood flow in the two hands (or feet) were found which were not stable from day to day, and which could be abolished, reduced, increased, or reversed by alterations in the external conditions which bring about general vasomotor changes. These inequalities, not associated with clinically recognizable differences between the parts compared, were interpreted as due to unequal activity of the vasomotor mechanism on the two sides. The condition appeared to be most frequent in certain groups of neurological cases.
Lobar pneumonia in 75 per cent of instances is due to specific types of pneumococci possessed of a high degree of pathogenicity. Although pneumococci occur in the mouths of 60 per cent of normal individuals, such organisms are readily distinguishable from the highly parasitic types of pneumococcus responsible for the severe forms of lobar pneumonia, a convincing proof that infection in this disease is, in the majority of instances, not autogenic in nature, but is derived from some extraneous source. In a high percentage of instances healthy persons intimately associated with cases of lobar pneumonia harbor the disease-producing types of pneumococcus. In every such instance the pneumococcus isolated has corresponded in type with that of the infected individual. Convalescents from pneumonia carry for a considerable length of time the type of pneumococcus with which they have been infected. The existence of the carrier state among healthy persons and among those recently recovered from pneumonia establishes a basis for understanding the mechanism by means of which lobar pneumonia spreads and maintains its high incidence from year to year.
We have attempted to discover whether or not certain protein materials, such as albumose, casein, and albumen, when introduced parenterally (peritoneally) into experimental animals, are able to produce organic lesions. These proteins were used alone or in combination with chloroform, which was administered in oil and as an anesthetic. Our results were negative.
A train of symptoms, coupled with retardation of tissue metabolism and with inactivity of the reproductive glands, not only accompanies states of experimentally induced hypophysial deficiency, but is equally characteristic of clinical states of hypopituitarism. The more notable of these symptoms are a tendency, in the chronic cases, toward an unusual deposition of fat, a lowering of body temperature, slowing of pulse and respiration, fall in blood pressure, and oftentimes a pronounced somnolence. These symptoms bear a marked resemblance to the physiological phenomena accompanying the state of hibernation which have heretofore been unsatisfactorily ascribed solely to extracorporeal factors; namely, a seasonal deprivation of food and low temperature. In a series of hibernating animals (woodchucks) it has been found that during the dormant period histological changes are apparent in many of the ductless glands. The most notable of these changes occur in the pituitary body, as previously observed by Gemelli. The gland not only diminishes in size, but the cells of the pars anterior in some animals at least completely lose their characteristic staining reactions to acid and basic dyes. At the end of the dormant period the gland swells, and as the cells enlarge they again acquire their differential affinity for acid, basic, and neutral stains, and at the same time karyokinetic figures may appear.
The central lobular necrosis in the liver, which has been regarded by some writers as characteristic of late chloroform poisoning, has been produced experimentally with a number of other drugs. It is, therefore, in no sense peculiar to chloroform poisoning. Substances which have been shown to produce a morphological picture indistinguishable from that of late chloroform poisoning are: (a) dichlor- and tetrachlormethane, (b) tribrom- and triiodomethane, (c) monochlor-, monobrom-, and monoiodoethane, also the dibromethane; that is, in general, the halogen substituted aliphatic hydrocarbons containing one or two carbon atoms. Presumably similar results might be obtained with the higher members of the same series. The mechanism by which chloroform produces its characteristic tissue changes must accordingly be considered as a group reaction. Outside the body the similarities between the chemical behavior of different members of this group have been correlated by Nef on the basis of the type of dissociation which these substances undergo and the differences in their behavior on the basis of the differences of the degree to which such dissociations occur. According to the work of Nef, the group of substances under discussion has the property of dissociating to yield a halogen acid and an unsaturated alkylidene rest. Thus with chloroform the type of dissociation may be expressed thus: See PDF for Equation In this paper the view is developed that the changes characteristic of late poisonings with the above named group, namely edema, multiple hemorrhages, fat infiltration, and necrosis are ascribable (1) to acids and (2) to the fact that the amount of acid formed parallels the chemical dissociability of the drug outside of the body. Favoring the view that acid is responsible for the changes are the following observations. 1. All the characteristic features of late chloroform poisoning have been produced merely by the administration of hydrochloric acid, except, however, for a different distribution of the liver necrosis. 2. The areas of central necrosis produced in the liver by the various substances under discussion give an acid reaction to neutral red. 3. Sodium carbonate in a hypertonic sodium chloride solution markedly inhibits the production of the lesions.
1. Fragments of skin from the leopard frog (Rana pipiens) were cultivated in media of varying consistency. A mixture of frog plasma, frog muscle extract, chicken plasma, and chicken embryo extract usually produced a very firm medium; a mixture of frog plasma, frog muscle extract, and chicken plasma, one less firm (semi-firm); and a mixture of frog plasma and frog muscle extract a medium of a consistency varying from soft to liquid. 2. (a) In a firm medium the cells which migrate into the medium are polyhedral (polygonal when seen from above) in form, which shape they retain permanently. They remain united in a compact membrane, the central parts of which consist of several (three to four) layers of cells. Migration of isolated cells into the medium does not take place. (b) In the semi-firm media the cells situated at the edge of the membrane become fusiform in shape, gradually detach themselves from the membrane, and stray out individually into the medium. This causes the membrane to become loose in character, and to contain holes, while its edges at the same time become very irregular and send out pointed projections. (c) In a soft medium the cells are fusiform or thread-like in shape. The migration of isolated cells is much more pronounced than in the semi-firm media, as a result of which the membrane undergoes constant and rapid loosening up. By this means whole portions of the membrane become detached and their separate parts are at first united by the thread-like columnar cells, which become drawn out in the form of long threads upon the separation of the individual sections of the membrane. The loosening up of the membrane is further assisted by liquefaction and the consequent formation of vacuoles; the latter process likewise results in the formation of thread-like columnar cells. (d) Liquid media contain only round cells. 3. This serves to explain numerous internal processes of the organism, especially certain changes of form observed by Leo Loeb in transplantations of wound scabs and of skin; the conditions artificially produced by Leo Loeb must have effected a change in the consistency of the medium. 4. It has been shown that it is unnecessary, for a satisfactory explanation of the above findings, to have recourse to the theories of "functional stimulus" or "inhibiting influences," by means of which Champy wished to account for the variations in the morphological character of the cells.
1. The heart muscle is not functionally impaired in pneumonia, since the pneumonic ventricle beats normally as soon as its food is normal. 2. Pneumonic blood, suddenly fed to normal heart muscle, lowers its efficiency, lessening the duration and the area of contraction. 3. The heart muscle in pneumonia, exposed gradually to the action of the poison, largely adjusts itself to its poisoned food.
1. After feeding, an increase in non-coagulable nitrogen of the serum can be determined, reaching a maximum in about six hours. 2. This increase is greatest in the portal blood and is partially due to an increase in amino-acids. There is no increase in proteoses. 3. There is usually a progressive decrease in serum protease, reaching a minimum after from five to seven hours. 4. The portal blood may show an unaltered or an increased amount of protease. 5. The serum antiferment shows a slight increase, but is subject to considerable fluctuation. 6. The serum lipase (esterase) shows a slight increase, reaching a maximum after three hours. The hepatic blood usually contains the lowest concentration of lipase.
1. The intravenous injection of trypsin in dogs results in a shock similar in many respects to anaphylactic and peptone shock. 2. The injection is followed by a marked rise of serum protease and lipase. 3. The antiferment usually shows a distinct drop in titer, with a recovery following in from four to twenty-four hours. 4. The non-coagulable nitrogen shows no constant alteration, but is never greatly changed in amount. 5. Inactivated preparations were in some respects followed by symptoms similar to those following the injection of the active preparation. 6. Subcutaneous and gastric absorption was practically without effect. 7. Intestinal absorption was followed by an increase in serum protease without evidence of intoxication, or by typical symptoms of acute poisoning. 8. The leucocyte curve bears no constant relation to the serum protease or lipase.
The injection of chicken embryo, in amounts of from 1 to 10 cc., confers no resistance against the Rous chicken sarcoma, when this is inoculated from 5 to 100 days after the preliminary treatment.
Castration neither increases nor decreases the inoculation percentage of transplantable carcinomata and sarcomata of the mouse and rat, nor does it either stimulate or retard their proliferation; it exerts not the slightest effect upon the growth of spontaneous carcinomata of the mouse.
Congestion of blood vessels and marked edema may occur in rabbits with a severe leucopenia. These two phenomena are, therefore, independent of the leucocytes.
Active immunity to the growth of tissue may be obtained by intraperitoneal injections of tissue emulsions. This immunity is of short duration and is followed by an anti-immunity. The immunity varies for individual tissues both in extent and in the time of onset. The immunity is not specific in so far that it is not more marked to the tissue similar to that forming the emulsion.
The refractory state to transplanted cancer, induced by the subcutaneous injection of defibrinated blood, is accompanied in every case by a definite lymphoid crisis in the blood. The rise of lymphocytes is not present during the interval between the immunizing injection and the cancer inoculation but comes on sharply within twenty-four hours of the introduction of the cancer graft. In control animals where the graft leads to a definite take there is no such lymphoid response, but in instances of natural immunity the phenomenon is similar to that seen in artificially induced immunity, though the period of rise is often delayed for several days or a week. The lymphoid crisis is not merely an accompanying factor in the immune period; it is essential to the process. This is demonstrated by the fact that destruction of the lymphocytes by x-ray is accompanied by the loss of natural or induced resistance to the growth of inoculated cancer. The polymorphonuclear cells show a tendency to increase in the animals with growing tumors, but further study will be necessary before any conclusions regarding them can be drawn.
1. The excretion of urea and of chlorides in the normal individual is carried out according to definite laws, capable of numerical expression. 2. The rate of excretion of urea and of sodium chloride is determined by the concentration in the blood, the rate of water output, and indirectly by the weight of the individual. 3. The threshold of sodium chloride excretion is practically constant at about 5.62 grams of sodium chloride per liter of plasma. Slight variations in the threshold occur in normal individuals. 4. The rate of excretion of urea under the conditions found at any time can be measured directly in terms of the normal by an index of urea excretion.
1. Following the removal of the pineal I have observed no sexual precocity or indolence, no adiposity or emaciation, no somatic or mental precocity or retardation. 2. Our experiments seem to have yielded nothing to sustain the view that the pineal gland has an active endocrine function of importance either in the very young or adult dogs. 3. The pineal is apparently not essential to life and seems to have no influence upon the animal's well being.
1. The protective substances contained in specific precipitates from antipneumococcus serum can be extracted by suitable chemical and physical agents, dilute sodium carbonate at 42 degrees C. being especially advantageous as an extractive agent. 2. The resulting water-clear extracts, when made up to the original volume of the serum used for precipitation, protect animals almost as well as does the whole serum. 3. The bacterial extracts used in precipitating the protective substances from the serum act specifically; that is, a bacterial extract of pneumococcus of Type I removes the protective substances from a Type I immune serum only. 4. In a polyvalent serum of Type I and Type II, the protective substances of each type may be removed independently of each other by the successive addition of the homologous antigens. 5. Extracts of specific serum precipitates contain only one-fiftieth to one-sixtieth of the protein in the original serum, and about one-half the protein of the whole precipitate. 6. Extracts contain not only protective substances but agglutinins and precipitins. 7. Extracts and whole precipitates not only confer passive immunity but stimulate the production of active immunity to pneumococcus infection in rabbits and mice.
The serum derived from human cases of pneumonia has been used to sensitize guinea pigs passively. As antigen an autolysate of a pneumococcus culture was employed. By means of Dale's method it has been possible to show with considerable regularity that the blood contains sensitizing antibodies during the course of pneumonia, but none after the crisis. Patients suffering from other diseases have failed to give this reaction, as have also normal individuals.
1. The larger the wound, the more rapidly the tongue enlarges and the earlier the closure of the wound takes place. Larger wounds heal, therefore, more quickly than smaller wounds within the variations in the size of the wound chosen in our experiments. 2. Both outgrowing of the tongues and contraction of the wound are concerned in the closing of the wound. A marked contraction sets in in the period preceding the closing of the wound and continues over a longer period with gradually diminishing intensity. The contraction, therefore, sets in earlier in the larger wounds. The contraction is also absolutely greater in the larger wound. 3. During wound healing the mitoses increase first markedly in the old epithelium and only very few mitoses can be found in the outgrowing epithelium during the first two days. Very soon the mitotic proliferation extends to the tongue and the number of proliferating cells may here become greater than in the old epithelium. With the closure of the wound a sudden fall in the number of mitoses takes place in both series. This fall is greatest in the tongue. Throughout the time of observation the number of mitoses is greater in the smaller wound. The fall in the number of mitoses directly after the closure of the wound is more sudden in the 4 mm. than in the 2 mm. series. It is, however, possible that the increase of mitoses extends over a larger area in the 4 mm. series than in the 2 mm. series. 4. It is probable that the difference in the rapidity in the outgrowth of the epidermal tongues and the resulting difference in the time of closure are mainly responsible for the difference in the variations in mitoses in the larger and smaller wounds. The longer the period of time over which the pull of the epithelium extends, the greater is the number of mitoses in this area. Therefore it is greater in the 2 mm. series. Closure of the wound is followed by a sudden decline in the number of mitoses especially in the area of the defect. Therefore the number of mitoses decreases earlier in the 4 mm. series, and we find here the smallest number of mitoses during the whole period of our observation. 5. The size of the epithelial cell and nucleus increases soon after the making of the wound. A maximum is reached in both the larger and smaller wound in the period just preceding the closure of the wound; this maximum is therefore reached earlier in the larger wound. Absolutely the maximal size reached in both kinds of wounds is approximately the same or only a little higher in the larger wounds. After the closure of the wound a sudden decline in the cell size takes place in the larger as well as in the smaller wounds. Then a more gradual decline sets in. Fourteen days after the operation the cells are still larger than in the normal skin. The variations in the size of the nucleus are similar to those in the whole cell, but less marked. The curves of variations in cell and nuclear size follow in both the larger and smaller wounds a curve similar to the variations in the number of mitoses. But the cell size returns more slowly to the normal condition than the number of mitoses. 6. The closure of the wound causes an increase in the number of epithelial rows over the defect. This increase is therefore reached at an earlier period in the larger wound. The increase is greater in the larger wound owing to the greater pressure which the two opposing cell layers exert upon each other in the larger wound. In the old epithelium the maximum in the number of cell rows is apparently reached slightly before the closure of the wounds. It seems that the epithelial movements leading to the closure of the wound start in the old epithelium and extend wave-like towards the wound. 7. It thus appears that the primary process in the wound healing consists in movements of the epidermis towards the wound, that these movements are carried out with greater energy in the case of the larger wounds, that the pull of the epithelium calls forth mitotic cell division, and that pressure exerted by epithelial cells upon each other leads to a rapid diminution in the mitotic proliferation.
A definite intoxication develops as a result of a closed intestinal loop and toxic material accumulates in the closed loops. Much evidence has been submitted to show that this loop poison causes the intoxication observed after producing a closed intestinal loop. Sufficient evidence has been presented to prove that the essential poison is present in these closed intestinal loops, and usually in concentrated form. Chemical study of the contents of closed intestinal loops shows that a single substance or group of substances possesses toxic properties. This resists autolysis and pancreatic and ereptic digestion. It is thrown out of solution by five volumes of alcohol or by half saturation with ammonium sulphate. It is readily soluble in water and is not injured by boiling. It is not removed by dialysis. The method of isolation excludes practically all substances except primary proteoses. The characteristic resistance to digestive enzymes suggests a heteroproteose. Proteose intoxication in dogs gives a picture identical with that described after poisoning with intestinal loop fluid: early salivation and vomiting, followed by diarrhea and prostration, fall in temperature and blood pressure, and finally death in collapse. Autopsy shows essentially a splanchnic paralysis and remarkable engorgement of liver and spleen, but especially of the mucosa of the duodenum and small intestine. The blood shows great concentration due to loss of fluid and may remain incoagulable because of an excess production of antithrombin. Proteoses escaping from the blood are excreted in the urine. This toxic proteose concerned in intestinal obstruction has not yet been isolated in the urine, but may be excreted by the kidneys. This probably explains the clinical improvement and lessened intoxication noted after transfusion. Experimental evidence points to a primary proteose as the essential poison concerned in the intoxication of closed intestinal loops and intestinal obstruction.
It is known that hemoglobin can be rapidly changed to bile pigment in a circulation confined to the head, neck, and thorax. This excludes direct liver participation (1). These experiments show that hemoglobin can be changed to bile pigment within the pleural or peritoneal cavities. This transformation can usually be detected after eight hours, and the amount can often be estimated quantitatively after an interval of twenty-four hours. Such experiments demonstrate the importance which may attach to extrahepatic bile pigment formation. That bile pigments can be formed without direct liver activity is established beyond doubt.
It has been shown that small amounts of the digestive secretions normally present in the duodenum regurgitate into the stomach following operative anastomosis between the stomach and the upper intestinal tract. As the duodenal contents are alkaline in reaction this reflux is thought by many to result in a decrease in the acidity of the gastric contents. The purpose of the investigations reported here has been to determine the effect of bile on the acid chyme of the stomach. By means of a cholecystgastrostomy with ligation and division of the common bile duct in six dogs the bile was diverted from the duodenum into the stomach. The secretion of gastric juice and the acidity of the gastric contents throughout the period of digestion were followed before and after the anastomoses. For this purpose three of the dogs were provided with Pawlow stomach pouches. In the three remaining animals the test meals were recovered by using apomorphin injections. The results from the two series of experiments agree. They indicate, at least with a diet of meat and water, that bile when it is present in the stomach throughout the course of digestion has no appreciable effect on the acidity of the gastric contents. While the anastomosis of the gall bladder to the stomach occasioned some temporary anorexia and vomiting in two of the dogs, the four remaining animals bore the operation well. Three or four weeks subsequent to the operation the digestion and the nutrition appeared normal in each instance. Postmortem examinations revealed no pathological changes in the gastric mucosa.
1. Syphilitic aortitis is a productive inflammatory process, the earliest and most constant feature of which is a perivascular round cell infiltration in the adventitia. 2. The typical gross picture of luetic aortitis is often obscured by a superimposed, diffuse atherosclerosis. In the early cases the aorta appears fairly normal, presenting only the characteristic histological changes. 3. A pure aortic insufficient valve, with the exception of an infectious endocarditis, is always luetic. 4. Cardiac hypertrophy is not a complication of luetic aortitis. When present it is usually associated with a nephritis. 5. The demonstration of Spirochoeta pallida, even in advanced specimens of syphilitic aortas, is doubtful. 6. An antigen prepared from alcoholic extract of guinea pig heart with the original Wassermann technique should be preferred in diagnosing luetic aortitis. 7. Positive complement fixations in patients suffering with syphilis for a period of about fifteen years or longer suggest the probability, at least, of histological luetic changes in the aorta in 80 to 90 per cent of the cases. 60 per cent of these die from aortitis. 8. About 94 per cent of patients suffering with aortitis give positive Wassermann reactions.
The similarity in the cases of rat-bite fever recorded in the literature establishes it as a definite clinical entity. The same symptomatology occurs in cases from Asia, Europe, and America. The greater frequency of the disease in Japan than elsewhere is probably due to the housing conditions and habits of the people resulting in the more frequent occurrence of rat-bites. It does not seem necessary to consider that cases occurring in Europe and America are due to the bites of rats that have been imported from Japan. The clinical picture and course of the disease indicate that it is infectious in origin. Until Schottmüller's case appeared in 1914, the etiology had been undiscovered. He isolated from his case in eight consecutive blood cultures a streptothrix which he has designated Streptothrix muris ratti. His work has been confirmed by the isolation of an identical streptothrix from the blood during life and at autopsy in the case here reported. Further confirmation of the etiological relationship of this organism to the infection in our patient is found in the production of powerful agglutinins for the organism in the blood serum of this case and in the demonstration of the organism in the vegetation on the mitral valve. It is not unreasonable to suppose that Proescher (13) observed the same organism in the sections of the excised wound in his case. Although it is fully realized that Koch's postulates have not been fulfilled in the absence of successful animal experimentation, nevertheless the accumulated evidence here presented leaves little reason to doubt that the specific cause of rat-bite fever is Streptothrix muris ratti. The pathology of rat-bite fever has hitherto been largely a matter of surmise. One autopsy only has been recorded in the literature (Miura (22)), and nothing abnormal was noted other than injection of the pial vessels. The autopsy in the case here reported has proved of considerable interest in the extent and character of the lesions found. A streptothrix septicemia with the localization of the organism in the mitral valve producing an acute ulcerative endocarditis is the most striking feature of the case. The infarcts of the spleen and kidney are a natural sequence of the endocarditis. The subacute lesions of the myocardium, liver, adrenal, and kidneys, glomerular and interstitial, are all of a similar nature, consisting of areas infiltrated with leukocytes, lymphocytes, plasma, and endothelial cells with varying degrees of degeneration of the normal cells of the affected area. In no instance has the presence of the streptothrix in these lesions been demonstrated, and it is not unreasonable to assume that they are toxic in origin. The data here presented may be correlated with the clinical features of rat-bite fever to give us a clear understanding of the course and nature of the disease. The patient is inoculated by the bite of a rat with Streptothrix muris ratti. After a variable incubation period a non-suppurative inflammatory reaction occurs at the site of the wound with extension to the neighboring lymphatics and lymph nodes. Invasion of the blood stream follows, accompanied by the onset of severe toxic symptoms. Clinically the nervous system and frequently the kidneys seem to be especially involved. That the myocardium, liver, and adrenals may also suffer is shown by the autopsy findings in the case reported above. Ulcerative endocarditis is probably a rare occurrence. In the majority of cases after a more or less prolonged course, the disease terminates spontaneously and so may be considered a self-limited infection. This is presumably brought about by the development in the body of a protective mechanism against the streptothrix. That such a process does occur is evidenced by the demonstration of agglutinins in our case. Whether a permanent immunity is acquired after one attack of rat-bite fever is not known. No instances of a second infection are recorded in the literature. Although rat-bite fever varies somewhat in its symptomatology in individual cases, the picture is sufficiently characteristic to make the diagnosis not a difficult matter. The history of a rat-bite, latent incubation period with subsequent non-suppurative inflammatory reaction of the wound, lymphangitis, and enlarged lymph nodes, severe chill at onset, high fever of the relapsing type, intense muscular pain and nervous symptoms, and the characteristic bluish red exanthem, present a symptom-complex not easily overlooked. The disease is frequently complicated by a severe nephritis, and prolonged cases develop a high grade of anemia and cachexia. In the case here reported ulcerative endocarditis occurred. In the large majority of cases the prognosis is favorable for a successful termination. The patients, however, are often incapacitated for a considerable period of time The mortality is about 10 per cent, death usually occurring in the first febrile period apparently from a profound toxemia, or at a later stage due to the development of a severe nephritis. Until recently treatment has been entirely symptomatic and has been of little avail in altering the course of the disease. Miyake has found immediate treatment of the wound by cauterization or with carbolic acid highly efficient as a prophylactic measure. Hata (30) in 1912 introduced salvarsan therapy and reported eight cases so treated, seven of which showed marked and rapid improvement. One case was apparently unaffected. Two of the cases receiving only small doses had a subsequent relapse. Surveyor (31) and Dalal (18) also have reported success with salvarsan injections. It is to be hoped that further experience with this method of treatment will yield equally favorable results.
1. Antipneumococcus serum possesses the power of inhibiting for a certain period of time the multiplication of pneumococci. 2. It also has the capacity of inhibiting the proteolytic and glycolytc functions of pneumococci. 3. This power is acquired for the first time or appears in increased amounts in human serum at the time of crisis in lobar pneumonia. 4. The retardation of bacterial growth is thought to be dependent upon the inhibition of metabolic function due to the presence of anti-enzymotic substances in antipneumococcus serum. To this phenomenon we have applied the term antiblastic immunity.
The feeding of egg yolk or pure cholesterol to rabbits produces an abundant deposit of anisotropic fat in various organs. From this deposit characteristic lesions secondarily result in certain organs. Prominent among these lesions is an atheroma of the aorta very similar in the gross and histologically to the human lesion. Lesions of other vessels are also produced, conspicuous among which are those of the branches of the pulmonary artery. There is a large deposit of anisotropic fat in the liver which produces a cirrhosis. Enlargement of the adrenals occurs, probably due to the storage of an excessive amount of anisotropic fat. In a certain proportion of rabbits conspicuous lesions are produced in the kidneys consisting of nodular deposits of anisotropic fat in the medullary portion, the fat being contained for the most part in endothelial cells and fibroblasts in the interstitial tissue. Later softening occurs in these areas as in the aorta; the cells break down; there is an abundant deposit of cholesterol crystals, some calcification, and a proliferation of connective tissue. Scars frequently extend outward from these lesions through the cortex, but the nodular deposits of anisotropic fat are never seen in the cortex. It is impossible to determine definitely from these experiments whether or not these deposits are dependent on preexisting interstitial lesions.
1. In dogs whose splenic veins have been ligated or transplanted into the inferior vena cava, or in which an Eck fistula has been made, an anemia occurs which resembles that following splenectomy and shows the same general variation in degree and duration. 2. The resistance of the red cells to hypotonic salt solution is quickly increased, sometimes coincident with and sometimes preceding the anemia. As a rule, it gradually returns to normal in about the same length of time as it takes the anemia to disappear, but may remain increased for longer periods. 3. There is an initial leukocytosis, involving at first the polymorphonuclear leucocytes and transitional cells. As the total leukocytosis diminishes there is both a relative and actual increase of small lymphocytes and usually of eosinophils. This may either be temporary or last during the rest of the period of observation and differs from the ordinary postoperative leukocytosis. 4. Ligation of the splenic vein is followed by considerable atrophy of the spleen, but not by necrosis or thrombosis. There is rarely adequate new vein formation. The other operations cause little or no change in the spleen. 5. Whether the disturbances as described are due to the loss of a certain volume of blood to the liver, or, as has been previously suggested, to the loss of a splenic hormone, it is impossible to say. If the former is true, the method of production of the anemia still remains unexplained. It is evident, furthermore, that the latter theory has also no value unless it is assumed that this hormone must be activated by passage through the liver.
1. Dogs whose splenic veins or portal vein (Eck fistula) have been transplanted into the inferior vena cava, or whose splenic veins have been ligated, show a lessened tendency to jaundice similar to that exhibited by splenectomized animals. 2. Although the previously existing anemia and the concomitant increased resistance of the red cells of these animals are undoubtedly factors in the greater resistance to hemolytic agents, the lessened tendency to jaundice is, in part at least, due to a mechanical factor dependent on the course of the blood supply to the liver. 3. The additional anemia caused in the test animals by hemolytic agents is usually less than in the controls, although the total fall from the original normal may be greater. This applies to the splenectomized as well as the other test animals and is a modification of our former statements in regard to the severity of the anemia in splenectomized dogs. 4. Although the destruction of blood in these animals is less than in the normal controls, the repair of the same takes considerably longer than in the controls. This confirms similar results previously obtained in splenectomized animals. 5. The white cells exhibit much the same changes as they do following the administration of hemolytic agents to splenectomized or normal animals. As these changes are not unlike those following uncomplicated splenectomy or the operations here discussed, they cannot be considered as characteristic of any of the above procedures, but perhaps as an accompaniment of any temporary increased blood destruction. 6. The reaction of test and control animals is substantially the same, whether the jaundice is caused by toluylenediamin or hemolytic immune serum.
In spite of numerous abnormalities or non-experimental lesions in the rabbit certain facts can be considered as established. It has been known for many years that pneumonia is produced by the more or less prolonged inhalation of high partial pressures of oxygen. The studies herein reported show that atmospheres containing 80 to 96 per cent oxygen under normal barometric pressure produce in 24 hours, or more commonly 48 hours, congestion, edema, epithelial degeneration and desquamation, fibrin formation, and finally a pneumonia, probably of irritative origin and to be described as a fibrinous bronchopneumonia. The important new points are the time relations of these changes and definition of the type of the pneumonia. Other studies have noted slight passive congestion, but it is now established that this is to be accounted for in most cases by dilatation of the right side or of both sides of the heart. This congestion affects all the abdominal viscera and is accompanied by certain secondary changes such as cloudy swelling of the parenchymatous organs and phagocytosis of erythrocytes by endothelial cells of the mesenteric lymph nodes. Although deficiency of oxygen may affect the hematopoietic system, the animals subjected to high oxygen percentages failed to show any demonstrable pathologic changes in blood, spleen, lymph nodes, or bone marrow, except for the presence of congestion. This study is the first of a comprehensive series projected in and under the direction of the Carnegie Nutrition Laboratory. Different animals and various methods of attack will be employed in the investigation.
1. The toxicity of uranium in animals of different ages is associated with the power of the metal to lead to the formation of organic acids, as, for instance, diacetic acid and also acetone. 2. The power of sodium carbonate to lessen the toxicity of uranium depends upon its power to delay the formation of such bodies and to cause their appearance in the urine in lessened amounts, and does not depend upon the power of the carbonate to detoxicate the metal. 3. The protection of the kidney by the carbonate, which is shown by the kidney being functionally much more active during an anesthesia than the kidney of a control animal, and by the Jack of fatty degeneration, acute swelling, and necrosis of the renal epithelium which is constantly seen in the unprotected kidneys, is probably dependent upon two factors: the neutralization of organic acids formed prior to and during the anesthesia, and the neutralization of hydrochloric acid which Graham has shown to be liberated by chloroform during an anesthesia induced by this substance.
The Flexner-Jobling adenocarcinoma of the rat is easily transplantable into the testis of this animal. The resulting growths in the intact testis do not often attain the size of subcutaneous tumors. The smaller size of intratesticular nodules can not be explained solely by the pressure to which they are subjected during their growth; other factors, which cannot be determined, appear to be concerned.
1. Spirochaetes from the living paretic brain easily infect rabbits with experimental syphilis. 2. They constitute a virulent strain with a shorter period of incubation for the rabbit than exists with other strains.
Acute ulcers of the gastric mucosa are found in a large percentage of dogs and cats dying after adrenalectomy. These ulcers seem to develop during the moribund period. They are apparently peptic ulcers forming at the site of local hemorrhages in the gastric mucosa. They are true acute ulcers, usually penetrating to the muscularis mucosa with a total loss of epithelium. They develop in the absence of pancreatic secretion and bile. However, they appear to develop only in an acid medium.
An adenocarcinoma of the mammary gland of an old guinea pig has been successfully transplanted through eight successive series of animals. It now appears much earlier and grows more rapidly. The number of takes also has increased. In two instances metastasis to the regional lymph glands (inguinal) has been observed. Once microscopic metastases were found in the kidney. The so called precancerous changes observed in the breasts of women and mice suffering from mammary carcinoma were found in the mammary gland of the spontaneous tumor animal. It is hoped that the tumor may soon be utilized for experimental purposes.
The erythrocytes of some species are much damaged when handled in salt solutions, as in washing with the centrifuge after the ordinary method. The injury is mechanical in character. It may express itself in hemolysis only after the cells have been kept for some days. It is greatest in the case of dog corpuscles, and well marked with sheep and rabbit cells. The fragility of the red cells, as indicated by washing or shaking them in salt solution is different, not only for different species, but for different individuals. It varies independently of the resistance to hypotonic solutions. The protection of fragile erythrocytes during washing is essential if they are to be preserved in vitro for any considerable time. The addition of a little gelatin ((1/8) per cent) to the wash fluid suffices for this purpose, and by its use the period of survival in salt solutions of washed rabbit, sheep, and dog cells is greatly prolonged. Plasma, like gelatin, has marked protective properties. Though gelatin acts as a protective for red cells it is not preservative of them in the real sense. Cells do not last longer when it is added to the fluids in which they are kept. Locke's solution, though better probably than Ringer's solution, or a sodium chloride solution, as a medium in which to keep red cells, is ultimately harmful. The addition of innocuous colloids does not improve it. But the sugars, especially dextrose and saccharose, have a remarkable power to prevent its injurious action, and they possess, in addition, preservative qualities. Cells washed in gelatin-Locke's and placed in a mixture of Locke's solution with an isotonic, watery solution of a sugar remain intact for a long time,-nearly 2 months in the case of sheep cells. The kept cells go easily into suspension free of clumps, they pass readily through paper filters, take up and give off oxygen, and when used for the Wassermann reaction behave exactly as do fresh cells of the same individual. The best preservative solutions are approximately isotonic with the blood serum. If the cells are to be much handled gelatin should be present, for the sugars do not protect against mechanical injury. Different preservative mixtures are required for the cells of different species. Dog cells last longest in fluids containing dextrin as well as a sugar. The mixture best for red cells is not necessarily best for leukocytes. A simple and practical method of keeping rabbit and human erythrocytes is in citrated whole blood to which sugar solution is added. In citrated blood, as such, human red cells tend to break down rather rapidly, no matter what the proportion of citrate. Hemolysis is well marked after little more than a week. But in a mixture of 3 parts of human blood, 2 parts of isotonic citrate solution (3.8 per cent sodium citrate in water), and 5 parts of isotonic dextrose solution (5.4 per cent dextrose in water), the cells remain intact for about 4 weeks. Rabbit red cells can be kept for more than 3 weeks in citrated blood; and the addition of sugar lengthens the preservation only a little. The results differ strikingly with the amount of citrate employed. Hemolysis occurs relatively early when the smallest quantity is used that will prevent clotting. The optimum mixture has 3 parts of rabbit blood to 2 of isotonic citrate solution. In the second part of this paper experiments are detailed which prove that cells preserved by the methods here recorded function excellently when reintroduced into the body.
In order to determine the availability for functional uses of red cells kept in vitro by our methods, transfusion experiments have been carried out with rabbits by which a large part of their blood was replaced with kept rabbit cells suspended in Locke's solution. It has been found that erythrocytes preserved in mixtures of blood, sodium citrate, saccharose, and water for 14 days, and used to replace normal blood, will remain in circulation and function so well that the animal shows no disturbance, and the blood count, hemoglobin, and percentage of reticulated red cells remain unvaried. Cells kept for longer periods, though intact and apparently unchanged when transfused, soon leave the circulation. Animals in which this disappearance of cells is taking place on a large scale, remain healthy save for the progressing anemia. The experiments prove that, in the exsanguinated rabbit at least, transfusions of cells kept for a long time in vitro may be used to replace the blood lost, and that when the cells have been kept too long but are still intact they are disposed of without harm. The indications are that kept human cells could be profitably employed in the same way.
